I can’t really answer that, but here are some possibilities (all speculation on my part):
Do you ever think about how you'd sew if there weren't any electricity? If Laura Ingalls could do it....
- churros & coffee
He was about 9 when we had a discussion about the wonders of masturbation and how it could save him from all kinds of difficult entanglements, including women who would steal him blind, neglect his children & spend his child support on cocaine.
Jenna - Sew Happy Geek
They didn't really have anything that I needed. We got some corn chips to go with dinner. And a new, louder alarm clock for Jake. And that was about it. I didn't even make my $20 minimum purchase for my rewards card! hmpf. hehe :)
The word husband is also a verb, which I really like — to till, or cultivate. A good marriage is a living thing that demands attention and care.
Today, though, she was less obvious about it. She’d been quiet since Haywire showed up. She paid more attention outside of the base than inside. She sat there, looking over her shoulder, watching the sparks fly up from the dying battle a few hundred yards away.
This isn't over - not by a long shot. They are already talking bout floating this bill later once the heat is off, or it showing up later under an even cuter acronym (Freedom Respecting Every Action and Knowledge). And our Supreme Court just declared that stuff out of copyright can regrow its copyright (though not necessarily under the original owners). There's going to be a lot more of this going on as we go forward. But for the moment, this has to go down as a win.
The measure was propelled by the fresh memory of community outrage this year over a quarter-million-dollar separation agreement between the Burnsville-Eagan-Savage school district and Tania Z. Chance, its former human resources director.
Tricky blighter, Johnny Liberty, eh?
4 storeroom
She's really not my type at all,
while cooking macaroni and cheese,
QueryShark is free.
I'll see you tomorrow for Day I peeps!
1) Mary P has has recently undergone laser eye surgery (one eye at a time) for her deteriorating eyesight. She is finding the new and vastly improved vision in one eye a new lease on life. Enjoy, Mary.
and stamped with a Magnolia-stamp around the edges.
If you make a scene or demand to see the station commander, they will then grudgingly oblige and open the docket, which gets tossed in the bin the moment you walk out the door. Same thing with every other serious crime - murder, rape, armed robbery, you name it. All this cooking of the books is being done in the name of wanting to make the incompetent, criminal black regime look good, while excoriating naysayers and realists as racist ogres who long for the “old days of Apartheid”.
My pan is 3" high, and I figured the entire batch might overflow, so here was my opportunity to try out a cake collar. From what I read, a collar is just parchment paper inside the pan to prevent overflow and get that extra height when necessary.
Let me warn you: the beast is coming. I’ve warned about that soon-coming day many times on this blog. The policies of the socialist left – and most certainly the policies of American Democrats – has dramatically increased the pace by which the beast is coming. Soon the world economies will collapse, and the only question is whether that collapse will be led by socialist Europe imploding first or Obama’s God damn America imploding first. In Europe, countries that barely even TRIED austerity as the only possible means to deal with their socialist-caused debt crisis are now demanding that they dive further into socialism – in effect saying the answer to solving the problem of crippling debt is to dramatically accelerate the rate of debt-spending. France is poised to elect open socialists. That is the way to hell, and the rest of the world will ultimately follow France into hell. In the ruins that we can already see coming, just as we can already hear the coming hoofbeats of the four horsemen of the Apocalypse, there will emerge a man who will come to the rescue to save the world from the collapse that socialism created. The left believes government is the only solution to the problems of man and society. Essentially, they see big government as savior. Worship of the state is their real religion. And don’t mistake me: the Democrat Party in God damn America will gladly worship him and take his mark. It won’t take long – only seven years – for every promise and every premise of the “global unity” that the left has been hungrily seeking to turn into total hell on earth. And then every baby-murdering Antichrist-worshiping Democrat will get the eternity they sowed for themselves.
If you are like me, you´d like to make the skirmishers look different from the heavier troops. You can do this in two ways.
Delany’s response: They’re right, it would. After all, it only makes sense that a recruit might be more tempted to sign with a conference whose institutions can afford to put that $8.22 in his or her pocket each day.
We also have a wonderful sense of community. There are so many of you who inspire us, Cool Communicators across the country who, through the way you are living your lives and through your advocacy, are making a difference; dedicated professionals—many of you members of ISAAC Canada— who are passionate about AAC and who have worked hard to make the events across the country happen; and families who are trying desperately to find the services and supports to help your loved ones communicate and live meaningful lives. And then there are all of the volunteers who jumped on board, some of you who knew little or nothing about AAC before getting involved in Kilometres for Communication. There are those of you who joined us along the way, old friends and new friends who cycled or traveled with us. There are our sponsors, many of you unfamiliar with AAC before making your contributions to Kilometres for Communication. There are also all of the reporters who understand the importance of what we are trying to do, and who are doing a wonderful job of helping us to spread our message. There are those who have donated and those who have continued to encourage us every step of the way. The hospitality we’ve been offered has been extraordinary. Skye and I talk about Kilometres for Communication as a campaign of generosity; it has been personally restorative and rejuvenating. To all of you who have participated, contributed, encouraged, and supported, I add my heartfelt thanks to Skye’s.
Does anyone need a new knitting project? RRP £9.99. Can't take the credit for this one I'm afraid- I borrowed this link from a friend. If anyone gets it, please let me know! I'd love a corgi, and I'd be your best friend... (Ha! I wrote this post before Pootle saw this and said exactly the same thing). Genius! I also like the Arch Bish...
Anyways, SL has its own economy, provided in a 90% maybe by all kind of stores that sells all what you can imagine. That’s it.
4. The gospel saves you from being a Pharisee by telling you:
I have been pondering often about our relationship to God lately.
Unexpected outcome
Then in Psalm 33: Verse 7 it says: the angel of the Lord encamps around those who fear Him and He delivers them. Wow! An angel of the Lord is camped around me; keeping me warm and keeps me safe from things that go bump in the night.
It was everything.
I’m reading his book right now. “Does The Noise In My Head Bother You? A Rock N’ Roll Memoir” .
I’m fighting the idea that writing is now a job, and I’m doing everything I can to keep it from being work. I still love to write. I’d still rather write than do just about anything, but when I write it’s not just about me, (or me and my niece), anymore. I have an agent who’s waiting to sell my next book. I have an editor who has to answer to a marketing department and a slew of other people about how my book is going to make the company money. Soon I’ll have readers, (fingers crossed), who are entertained and maybe even influenced by what I write. Hopefully they will be looking forward to reading something else I’ve written.
Society tells us what the ideal body image is and until recently, with the influx of plus size models, that was size 0 without curves or blemish. Who really wears a size 0? Even plus size models are the ideal at size 14. As a woman with curves I have had to embrace my curves and really step into that but society alone is not to blame.
And the reason for abandoning the railroad after such an extensive beginning? The Southern Pacific, through its subsidiary, promptly started another line to the coast from Eugene, 40 miles north. This line was much more of a project, for it had to cross the rugged Coast Range of mountains. It reached the ocean at Florence, at the mouth of the Siuslaw River, then followed the coastline south through the Lower
I try really hard to say no to the spitting
(Published in the Manila Standard Today newspaper on /2012/May/02)
The End of Time (Part 1 of 2). Special Episode 7.
Granted, words such as “nigger”, “cracker”, “honky”, “white trash” or “devils” (many rappers refer to whites as “devils” without, it seems, any problems from the “music” industry) are offensive, and are known to be. That, however, such words are used as the precursor to physical violence should, in my opinion, not be automatically taken to imply that a murder is racially motivated. To quote John Upton:
There is also the holy within us. We are created in the image and likeness of God and we need to tend the holy within us. The gifts and talents we have been blessed with need to be tended for they are indeed holy.
And then he whispered
I have followed the election laws of Oregon in the formation of the Cammann Road District in Coos County Oregon. I have done nothing wrong and will not resign my elected office of Commissioner of the Cammann Road Dist.
The journey is only beginning. The bleeding needs to stop. I know I am not alone. God is there at our side, journeying with us, sustaining us through the gifts of friends, the prayers of strangers. I am looking forward to Shaun's mum arriving on Tuesday. Hoping that his sister can come later too. Will keep you posted!
Only if you meet these requirements, the rate is suitable, and you can afford to wait a 3-4 weeks approval should you send your CV to: william@caglobalint.com; along with the following mandatory docs:
Key Advantages:
I find that riding often feels like climbing stairs, or hilltops.
“My daughter had a scheduled caesarean section, so I requested some time off,” remembers Coney. “My managers worked with me so I could spend about a week with my grandbaby. Both mother and infant are doing well.”
Now, as some of you know, I wrote a novel about Louisiana voodoo and creepy stuff in general. This might not be a huge ghost story, but I tell ya, it raised my hair somewhat. The coincidence was just too uncanny.
The way the new England manager says his ‘r’s is neither here nor there. ‘Correct’ pronunciation is t ied up with prejudice
but I'm still thinking about you my bloggy friends.
I love their comfortable and friendly atmosphere. To me, it is a nice restaurant that I want to dress up for a little, but it's not so fancy we can't take our kids. In fact, they offer a great selection & quality on their Kid's Menu, and I love their kiddie cups with lid, and the crayons & paper keep them busy while we wait for the food.
To make the sauce combine the yogurt, tahini, lemon juice, salt and garlic, combining with a whisk or a fork.
947 **D-VI/1(B)/1986. “The Ten Commandments.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 613-40.)
I am aware we don’t start off with the best of odds; if this were a game I wouldn’t bet on it… I have played different scenarios in my mind; I have mentally drenched us in disaster. Would we survive the worst? Would “us” survive the worst?
In 2008, the premiers of Ontario and Quebec pledged that each province would protect half of its northern boreal forests. There is now hope that the 190 million acres of boreal forest in Ontario and Quebec will eventually be made off-limits. Last year, 21 of Canada’s largest logging companies and nine conservation groups proposed the Canadian Boreal Forest Agreement to support the protection of more than seventy million acres.
2: HK ETF’s on Mainland market: Don’t know about that though… Better than nothing, but seems a little bit like a PR gig to me, and who knows what exactly will come out of the derivatives tied to them…
The word Woodbine has floated to the surface of my consciousness. Mother once said there was a woman who every springtime appeared in downtown Springfield selling Woodbine which she had gathered in the forest and brought to town to peddle.
Happy voting,
‘it has potential.’
Pete and Ronnie
The man only escaped from her apartment when she fell asleep.
The BBC reported his name.
For the first five to ten days you eat only protein enriched foods, that is meat, fish, milk and eggs, no vegetables, salad or fruit at all....very testing stuff. Later in the program you can eat green vegetables, but only every other day until your goal weight is achieved...According to Dukan, following his plan means at least two months for the best results.
at your ghost
Fixed dialling number support
for the understanding of the verdict you address, I refer you to the fact that the juvenile law is dedicated first and foremost to the education of the youthful perpetrator.
Is all I own.
Tidy gave a huff that was somewhere between a snort and a sneeze.
I began writing professionally in 2006, and was busy learning the business from the ground, up. I quickly realized how word of mouth can be one of the greatest marketing tools, especially if you speak occasionally about other attention grabbing topics in everyday life. We, as humans, love listening and voicing our opinions and thoughts on everyday issues, and we love to interact with others to gain info or simply gossip about nothing. We listen when people recommend simple solutions to problems, recipes or the hottest, new movies to see.
With Doomsday looming ahead, most days I managed to carve out some writing time. I had a self-imposed deadline to meet, with dead being the operative word. Fifty, sheesh. D-Day crept closer and closer, and Godzilla eschewed orthotics.
Drain and rinse red lentils. Put in a large saucepan and cover with water. Bring to a boil and reduce heat to medium. Cook for about 20 minutes, until very tender.
Between 2000 and 2010, according to this census, the Mormon population in Utah mushroomed the most in Tooele County, going from 25,837 to 38,888, a 50.5 percent bump. Morgan County has the highest percentage (88.9 percent) of Latter-day Saints, followed by Utah County (88.7 percent) and Rich County (88 percent). Ten years earlier, Utah County had the highest at 87.6 percent.
Dear Kellie – You are the love expert.
a safety hazard.
I thought this was a terrible thing to say to someone who had always paid and I guessed the neighbour hadn't got into arrears either. I think the street had been missed out by the collectors.
Have a Great Weekend! I'm tossing it in early this week.
Sixth, and finally, how do you pronounce your name? I presume that it’s the French way, but I know that some men by the name of Jean – Americans mostly, who find the idea of a soft J offensive – pronounce it ‘Gene’ and don’t want to embarrass myself or, for that matter, you, when we inevitably converse via the phone.
Downtown Las Vegas, NV
Written by: Robert Lowry
“When we started the show in 2009,” Writer and Producer Jay Smith said after the ceremony, “I had no idea that audio drama was something anyone really cared about in this age of megapixels and Michael Bay pyrotechnics, but it really is a thriving storytelling medium with hundreds of shows out there to hear – many for free. The field was very competitive which makes this award all the more gratifying. We have actors on three continents producing excellent work and a brilliant, passionate production team led by Michael L Stokes that creates a unique, quality audio drama series.”
It will be Ketuanan Melayu as promised by Umno to the Malays but it will be Ketuanan Melayu that must be implemented with the common good of all Malaysians as its ultimate goal.
Our eldest son turned 5 on Christmas Eve, so we always work really hard to keep his birthday special and separate from Christmas. It was so easy to do with Chuck E. Cheese, and they were open all day on Christmas Eve.
(tomorrow, I am making no plans at all. Apart from soccer. Just that plan. And then NO OTHER PLANS. We are going nowhere)
The first three days we were here, we unpacked the kitchen then got right to work fixing the paddock fence so we could bring our previously boarded horse home. As she had been for years, our mare was kept in a small pen and we wanted to get her out on space and grass and rocks as soon as possible. We thought we'd be able to simply repair the fence that was here, but upon close inspection we found that we needed to start over again - the old barbed wire fence had been stretched and patched with tie wire and any manner of things, and the corner posts were rotted and broken down. Grandparents were here for the weekend and all lent a hand, either picking up bags of trash (wire, wood, nails, metal, glass, recyclable) from the paddock or working directly on the fence.
So thanks for letting me vent. Again. And please, wherever you follow my Super Important Updates, please forgive me if you get the wrong ones. Or none. Or if I drop my phone and accidentally send you an Instagram photo of my foot. I swear, I'll figure out the 20th century if it takes me the rest of the century.
inside, outside, upside down around here lately. a porch project going on the front of the house. and with mr. traybella out of town last week, i rearranged everything again inside. i'll have posts on these later, but let's get to todays.
Kagawa is a master storyteller. While the story is interesting it is the characters that you love when you pick up one of her novels. Her characters are fully developed, their feelings, lives, and experiences leap off the page. Their thoughts and emotions become so real to the reader that you can’t put the book down. You fall in love with her characters and have to know where the story goes.
As the Captain of a ship nears the vicinity of the lighthouse, he grows stronger and more confident. He knows that very soon the light from the lighthouse will fill the darkness before him and guide him to safety. He knows the light will be there and he can depend on it.
I have their Estrus EP lined up for future release and, as far as I can tell, that record also features four 'versions' which have never been reissued or reused in any form. Again, please please please correct me if I'm wrong.
Horkheimer, Max, and Theodor W. Adorno. Dialectic of Enlightenment. New York: Herder and Herder, 1972.
08 Clear It Away
I was at a cooking class and thought that this would be the perfect setting for a novel. So it began….. And yes, five years later, I am still working on it (the cooking and the writing). It’s the most challenging yet invigorating endeavor I have ever undertaken. A love hate relationship. Conflict. All wonderful ingredients for a story and a blog.
since I’ve seen your smile.
Finding the areas of uncertainty
But of course like all good things it didn’t last. The enemy fought his way back into my brain and built a new stronghold. The battle has to be won over and over again every day. Some days I just don’t care to fight it. Some days I haven’t got the energy. Some days I don’t see the point in trying. Some days I wish I was dead. Because I feel like I’m dead to the world anyway. I know it isn’t so but I still feel it. Just because I can’t break through the wall so I can reach where I wish to reach. Sometimes I even feel better not trying at all. Those days are the worst. When I think that locking myself away from everything is better than trying to reach it. At least when I don’t try to reach anything or anybody I don’t risk failure. I don’t risk being hurt or disappointed if I don’t reach my high standards or if I simply fail anyway. Yet those days are the days when I hurt the most because giving up without even trying is a worse failure than any other.
When the current Arandish Campaign started in early 2010, one of the participants came to me during the character generation phase and asked if he could play a juggler in the game. Being the sort of DM who likes to let players run with their ideas -- my games have always benefited greatly from the creative contributions of the players -- I of course said "yes."
And earthly thrones and kingdoms fall,
For my friends, the brand new moms: May your baby latch on like a champ and sleep in long stretches. May you shower most days. May your husband have a great paternity leave policy.
I die cut and embossed the bird from the S5-075 Spellbinders Cuckoo Clock set shown below. The birds are popped up with 3D Foam squares onto a grey background matted with blue on white.
Fragile moon, the diva is singing,
What you'll need: Fabric, scissors, fabric glue, water, smooth rocks or stones, wax paper, felt letter stickers
Enjoy discussing what your preschooler learned today. Share your own ideas only after he or she has shared his or her.
In a small bowl, stir together the mayonnaise and mustard until well blended. Add the mixture, along with the remaining ingredients, to the bowl and toss well. Taste and adjust the seasoning with salt and pepper, if desired.
But maybe something eternal could. Maybe it’s an eternal thing that we lose and need.
They were calling for rain but it was a sunny, warm day instead.
So perhaps - as can so often be the case - it is the hallowed turf of this small area of central England which makes the difference.
Yet, as the world is watching another brutal and senseless violence on Bersih’s peaceful sit-in, the call for the right to assembly without the fear of force raining down was drenched by the act of violence which occurred during the rally.
The show follows a biker gang called the 'Sons of Anarchy' and all the doings in and around the Northern California town of Charming where they hang out. It is sort of like "The Sopranos" with Harley-Davidsons, with a lot of intertwined plot development and interpersonal issues between the biker club members.
So it was with great interest that I came across this headstone this morning as I was posting my latest cemetery information to FAG.
Mommy chuckled, deeper than her normal laugh. “Trust me, it’s not. Nothing’s too much for a friend.”
because books are a treasure worth protecting
Note: I work for SharedBook
No wonder opinion polls show a majority of the population are sceptical about global warming. Just scanning the papers, the internet or watching TV is enough to convince anyone it’s just the usual apocalyptic hype. And, if they want to dig deeper into their own disbelief, there are shelfloads of books to give them a hand. There’s Nigel Lawson, ex-chancellor of the exchequer, with An Appeal to Reason. There’s Scared to Death by Christopher Booker and Richard North. There’s Cool It by Bjorn Lomborg. There was even a very serious documentary on Channel 4 called The Great Global Warming Swindle with some serious-looking science guys pouring cold water on the warming atmosphere.
The problem was, after his wife started feeding him, he started coughing milkshake colored sputum. This was especially worrying, as immediately BEFORE the milkshake, his sputum was NOT that color. "But he's had a swallowing test done!!!" insisted his wife.
A fresh coat of creamy white paint on the cabinets
In the wake of every traumatic experience humans are re-traumatised, in new and unfamiliar ways. These repercussions combine to create the occurrence of an aftermath, and are ripples of the traumatic events which gave them being.
We are sponsored by our awesome monthly sponsor Simon Says Stamp!!! They have so many lovely things to craft with. You just have to see to believe all that they have.
I am also fascinated, though I don't claim to understand it, by the Precession of the Equinoxes, thought to be at the heart of the mysteries of the Mithraic religion.
Aug 19 Atlanta, GA (Review by Shotgunopera/LPU)
Here is the reason for my lack of cardmaking!
So I fully recommend taking the time to reflect on how you behave, take in information and make decisions. If you can discover where your strengths lie, you can become much stronger as a leader
Step 4 (In Which The Alcohol Is Uncorked): While the cakes bake (only for 8 minutes!), I stir together the syrup! It is composed of sugar, strong coffee, and brandy. This was the smallest brandy bottle I could find at the liquor store! I don’t recognize this label. I don’t know if it’s very good brandy, but it’s a darn large bottle for only $9.99. I wonder.
Yes, brothers and sisters, we have been bought for a price and our lives are no longer our own, it is our destiny, yea even our mission in life to give ourselves totally to the Spirit of God to conform us to Jesus, so that He, living and working through us, might bring to completion the purpose for which He was sent, namely, to bring the Kingdom of His Father to this world and, thus, restore God’s creation to its original Glory!
Source: I received a pdf copy of the book for my review and participation in the tour.
The Bible compares us to clay pots, saying that although we are imperfect we are still God’s chosen vessel for His life and light; our flaws and imperfections allow that light and glory to shine out so others can see. Those cracks also help us remember that our life, strength and any goodness that shows from within us is from God. It’s a miracle we don’t burst into a million dusty bits considering the brilliant, immense, holy, mighty, awesome Spirit of God is living in and through us. Who are we to be allowed to carry such treasure??
It’s waiting, just beyond the bend.
Combine cake flour, sugar, baking powder and salt in bowl of standing mixer fitted with paddle attachment. Mix on lowest speed to blend, about 30 seconds. While mixer is still running, add butter, one piece at a time (Make sure to cover mixer bowl with a kitchen towel for the initial mixing, to keep all the ingredients in the bowl instead of your lovely face :).
If this doesn't cheer you up, nothing will.
Since summer started I have been trying to find a lighter flavorful beer because I have not been in the mood for any IPA or heavier beers. The last 2 Sam Adams have hit the spot nicely and I would recommend giving the Light beer a try to anyone.
People remembered the advert because it was—albeit self-consciously—quirky, but they didn't remember what it was advertising because there is no connection between an ape playing along to Phil Collins and Dairy Milk chocolate. In the Foster's adverts, however, the two protagonists have constantly got a beer to hand, thereby reminding the public of what it is they're supposed to buy.
Of course, I wouldn’t guarantee that achieving that brings me to the it that I’m still looking for. Perhaps things would be clearer if I were MUCH younger.
Beautiful as the setting sun
This is also a Read 2 Me book, which means that in the next two years, my boys will be able to start reading it to me. The words are small. The sentences short. And even better, it is a story that I won't mind reading over and over again ... or having to listen to over and over again. It's short, sweet, and touching; it teachers a lesson while captivating in a peaceful way.
“Parents of children with autism often say that other people simply think their child is naughty; while adults find that they are misunderstood.”
Self will and self centeredness are just part of the human condition. I find it quite outrageous that we would expect change in America when we are unwilling to change the man in the mirror...
No energy.
If you could have dinner with three guests (living or dead), who would you choose and why?
A playroom, it was stuffed with overflowing bookshelves and toys and tables and a giant castle.
I like to draw the color layer especially during my designing because when I change the mode to overlay, I can readily see whether or not I am going to want to darken or lighten the thread layer so it corresponds to my palette.
size in two inches of bone- crushed heads were quite common-
Amish proverb
the fun of new years with friends . . . and the lil' miss's very first slumber party.
Chris giving me kisses (she gets really jealous & will jump off the bed if she's next to me & go pout).
Then, just enter whatever email address you want, and save. Easy peasy. And remember-- it doesn't have to be the email you sign in with-- it can be any email address you want. (Although I wouldn't recommend setting it to somebody else's email address just to be funny. But that would be funny.)
Yes if you can treat it as add-on sales. In other words if the customer can pay for it or if you see a greater market potential in the suggestions.
She doesn't remember the nanny we had for the first 2 years of her life and then the next year for her brother. She doesn't remember the last trip to the zoo. She doesn't remember having adenoid surgery and the wonderful care we gave her after. The girl can't even remember if she brushed her teeth 10 minutes later!
Woman calls 911 because her wood furnace is making strange noises, splashed water all over the floor and there is pressure in the pipes. She's grabbed the kids out of bed, threw them in the truck and hightailed down the road because she thinks it's going to explode. I'm shaking my head but hey, she thinks it's danger and she got out,that's cool. I just couldn't help but thinking how I had a hard time convincing people to leave a burning building. Maybe next time I'll mention the furnace has a rattle.
I really like snowmen. I have a few here and there, but not nearly as many as I would like to have. And of course, it isn't like we get the kind of snow down here that you can make a real snowman. So, I have figured out how to make snowmen myself. Southern style. Thanks to the internet and Pinterest. You can follow me here on Pinterest, if you want to.
These first two pictures show the three different kinds of bayonets I own. All three will work on the Mossberg 590A1 and also the AR platform rifles. The first two are the Smith &Wesson M9 at the top and a standard Vietnam issue M7 second. The next picture is the Ontario M9 Tanto.
Leviticus 18:22 & Leviticus 20:13
Right as we finished our appetizer our meal came out. My husband enjoyed his wrap. He said it tasted fresh and was the perfect amount for dinner. I wish I could say the same about the chicken tenders. The fries that came with the chicken was delicious. The chicken tenders were sub par to say the least. I have bought better chicken tenders from the freezer section of the grocery store. I realize that I am paying more for the experience but $12 for chicken tenders, well, I would have preferred fresh tenders.
That is why even people who are stuck in bad rhythms think they are navigating life just fine. They are comfortable even if their rhythm is; stay up late, sleep till noon, score some 'help', hang with friends, talk about a job, stay up late, sleep till noon, score some 'help', hang with friends.... It's their rhythm. It comforts them.
It has written to the Brighter Futures Housing Association in Stoke, offering it the "opportunity" to lease homes to it.
I tried on a variety of items this time around and had great luck finding lots of things to add to my ever-growing wish list. I'll start off with the two things I ended bringing home with me:
The day of the event I felt as prepared as I could be, but I really didn't know what to expect. Just before the session was about to begin I discovered that the sample user stories that I had so carefully prepared as handouts for each team were missing and I didn't have time to create new ones. And then I discovered that the easels and stickies for each table weren't set up for each table as I had requested and weren't even in the room! I was starting to get knots in my stomach. What would I do now?
In any case, I'm looking forward to future objections. I need the laughs.
Donald Trump seems to think that he has public support in Scotland because few people turned up at Robert Gordon University to protest against the honorary degree which was bestowed upon him.
One more thing to show you, when I first saw this pattern for a little person's lady bug apron I knew I just had to make one, So I did..I love it and I'm sew happy with the way it turned out.
Her essence mine, no longer a puppet of her will
setting words on fire,
It contains a gift in a jar, oven mitt, full cello bag, and a wooden spoon. What a great seller for a craft show. You could also add a bath & body assortment with a sponge and a gourmet kitchen food assortment. How about dinner in a bag? Such as spaghetti sauce, spaghetti noodles, garlic spread, and a spreader .
Big eyed beans from Venus,
Readers like to know there's hope - and even if you write for yourself and never get your work out there, you have a duty to yourself to see the upside occasionally too!
It’s been just about six weeks since I learned I have Crohn’s disease. I have been doing a lot of thinking and informal research on topics that I never had to give much thought to before. I keep coming back to three big ideas.
Combine all ingredients in a bowl
soft beneath our feet.
One thing's for certain: I little expected I would spend my 65th birthday in deep discussion with my best friend, Thomas Hamburger Jnr, on the subject of fonts.
I saw this video series on YouTube which crystallizes these notions precisely.
So these little Cupid Cupcakes are what I have made for our Valentine Party tomorrow night to meet the 'Cake Criteria Rule.' They will be served along side Cupid's Crunch, heart shaped pizza, heart shaped jello and heart shaped cookies. And any thing else I can get my heart shaped cookie cutter to slice through. You know, if you're gonna do it, you might as well do it right!
Pegasus is a story about two completely different races living in a symbiotic relationship together. The humans kill the natural predators of the pegasi, and the pegasi’s presence always bring abundance to the humans.
and in my defense, it's kind of a hard song to sing.
*If any of you were going to suggest that because I am female, this image is not applicable, please go screw yourselves.
1. The upper walls are painted the same gray color as the kitchen island to help connect the adjacent rooms, while creamy horizontal wood planks are found below the chair rail.
Me: "uh . . . ok."
Finally, it was decided that the stove had a leak and was holding gas and when it would build up and the stove was turned on (flame) the whole thing would explode. We turned off the gas and have been waiting for 7 days for a new stove. Apparently, it should be in tomorrow. Let's hope my home stays flame free.
And more:
No breach.
As I said at the start, this idea might be a complete flight of fancy. It might have no bearing at all on reality. However, it seems to be a credible explanation of why Mr Whitehouse mentioned 11th May.
Markers: Real Red, Glorious Green, Blush Blossom, Creamy Caramel, Basic Gray and Basic Black
So when I consider the number of projects I have been involved in from South St. Paul MN, Crookston, MN, Red Wing, MN, Verizon Telecommunications national subject matter expert on economic development targeted foundation investments, Wayne County, IN and then consulting literally all over the world these past 6 years, it can be a very huge number. Even some of my colleagues would be shocked. But my life has been anything but normal or usual. I have worked on some of the biggest and most exciting projects in the world. And yes, some are still in the works (thus they are not part of my tally officially until they close eventually). Some projects take a number of years to work through all the mitigation issues, such a developer failures, the global financial crisis and local politics and criticism by the media. So I tend to use a conservative multiplier between REMI and IMplan and have even accounted for the most conservative rule of thumb valuation business case. But in the absence of a formal policy by my colleagues each of us most choose a business method we are comfortable with and that we can maintain some degree of familiarity with over the years.
An Ideal For Living
SHUT THE HELL UP, SCHWARZENNEGER. Idiocy doesn't sound any better though an Austrian accent.
Clinging two-hundred and fifty feet above the ground on the western cliff face of Jinxia Gorge in Shanxi Province, China, the Hanging Monastery, Xuankong Si, is an engineering and architectural wonder of the ancient world. With massive support beams buried half their length into the surrounding bedrock, the structure appears to defy the natural order of gravity, while in reality, using the environment fully to its advantage.
OSHA recommends Outreach Training Program courses as an orientation to occupational safety and health for workers. Workers must receive additional training, when required by OSHA standards, on the specific hazards of their job.
The trash talking started a few weeks ago. The drama begins in earnest at 7 pm CST tonight. I've been watching the hype of ESPN's GameDay all morning. I'll be watching the actual game from the safety of a suburban living room with a massive screen, drinking lots of beer. So, what beer goes best with Tiger meat?
The 5 Liverpools actually were The Liverpool Five, but on their first recordings German CBS insisted on christening them this way. After a year in Germany they went off for an extended tour to Asia (thus the reason for the LP-title), but instead of returning to Frankfurt, they settled down in the States, where they found considerable success. +++
President Barack Obama last night took his victory lap marking the first anniversary of the killing of Osama bin Laden to Afghanistan, landing in Kabul amid elaborate secrecy to deliver a live televised address.
I am currently backing up my iPod so I can update it. It takes forever. I have to delete all my apps! Why won’t it work? Oh yeah.. everytime it starts I get a notification saying someone has sent me a new blah blah blah! And that makes it stop….urg! imma punch someone really, really hard.
Bag: Clamshell kiss-lock Scurvy purse from Paul Frank
Of course, since Trunk’d Clothing is a type of direct sales company I have to haul all my goods in the trunk of my car. Then I thought about how people used to bring their clothes over in steamer trunks and I decided to play up on both concepts and Trunk’d Clothing was born. Very creative and inventive of me I know. The rest will be history as soon as we have our first party in 2012 because we know that people will enjoy the time spent with family and friends, eating, and shopping in a comfortable atmosphere. And let’s not forgot all the perks of hosting a party.
Roy walks around the bar and orders a drink from a different bartender. He tries his trick with the twenty and ten again, but this bartender must have seen it before, as rather than grab the bill, he grabs Roy's wrist and exposes the palmed twenty. He holds Roy there and reaches under the bar grabbing a club, which he jabs into Roy's gut, sending him across the room. Roy leaves doubled over, having trouble breathing.
“Fine. I don’t want to go on this stupid trip, anyway. I got better things to do.”
"He's lying!"
Fuels today offer a wide variety of instabilities for two stroke engines. They are formulated, by demand, to cater to the automotive side of engines. Small engines, like your chainsaw, blower and trimmer, are forced to try to burn it and survive.
Don’t think that Delany doesn’t know that. Gene Smith sure does.
In a job interview, I was asked what I understood of team work, and in feedback after they noticed that all my answer was of what I could give, and none of what I could expect. Armed with this feedback, I cobbled together a more rounded answer about teamwork. With this weekend building on other learnings in the past year, it seems to me that I may give and receive and- dance with- other people far more deeply than before.
I just barely took Darcy to her two year checkup and I thought I would do a little update about her.
and I said, 'yeah'
"My center to you is given:
If we want to stop youths from rioting, the solution isn’t to transfer more wealth to them by raising taxes and substituting government welfare checks for fathers. That’s what feminism teaches, but it’s not working. It’s been tried in the UK and Canada and it doesn’t work. To stop children from being violent, you need a father in the home, and he needs to be empowered to work and earn and to set up moral boundaries. Fathers do not just appear, they need to be given incentives, they need to be given authority, they need to be given respect, and they need to be encouraged by women and by government.
Jones was then removed from the vehicle and placed under arrest. The contact between the two cars resulted in minor damage to both vehicles but there were no injuries reported.
KIDS STUFF - PAT FERRIN returns with a big bag of tricks for the pups - last year's drainpipe 'n ball will never be forgotten... not to mentio the coconut shy ....plus lots of interesting creative activities for the lille' ones.
In the next few weeks, this column will cover some of the issues which are likely to have a bearing on the 2012 Budget.
Why start?
Helping people make a teary-eyed mess since the beginning of time, the sex trade worker induces this mess via a series of physical tasks. Some are completed through external means (the human hand is a gifted mimic), while others are achieved by employing more orifice-based methods. If you carefully examine your body in the mirror, you'll notice that it is covered with these hollowed out passage ways that resemble caves. Well, some people like to insert certain items into them over and over again until a mess is made.
Children filled with faith and hope, and not despair, can change the world.
but for now, heres the valentines owl...
Second point is the idea of material inference. Brandom contrasts the idea of material inference to that of formal inference – and again the question is one of explanatory priority. A formal inference is one that obeys an explicitly formulated rule of inference, which rule is applicable independent of the content of the inference. A material inference, by contrast, is an inference the goodness of which depends on the content of the claims being inferred from and to.
My friends and I would organize and re-organize our CDs whenever we bought new ones, or depending on which one was the favorite of the week. The kids I work with don’t bring their CD cases to school. They bring their ipods, or they don’t bring their music for fear of drawing attention to the fact that they don’t have an ipod. Kids these days missing out because CD cases were awesome, and the music in them was even better.
Four years later Mr Sheridan found himself in the dock at the High Court in Glasgow, charged along with his wife with committing perjury in the original trial. After a lengthy hearing, he was found guilty on certain of the charges and sentenced to three years in prison.
I'll try to be a better girl. I really like it here and think I just need to grow up a little more. The doctor said maybe a dose of Ritalin would be good for me. I'm just 9 months, you know. I'm only half way there.
It’s a sweet image – if it was being used for a TPB cover of MEPHISTO: EATS A STARSHIP. But as a movie poster … I’m not sure seeing the Enterprise taking a kamikaze run at a giant man’s chin is going to get people excited about seeing this movie.
E@L, on pain meds for neuropathy that stabilise his moods (as a side-effect only), really is in a happy(ish) state most of the time nowadays (not counting the explosive issue of $80 for an undercooked here, overcooked there tri-partite collection of gristle and tendon they called a steak at Neil Perry's Rockpool Grill at Crown Casino last Sunday - sorry couldn't wait for the next blog post), so he has to try hard to think of some crucial issue, some key cause, some misguided belief system that he will find sufficiently abhorrent, in-your-face wrong and cruelly harmful enough to fire up strong negative feelings in his serotonin re-uptake modified existence... There must be something other than bad steak or the usual pub conversations with his friends that will get him riled and angry.
I began this blog as an outlet for myself. However, due to fears of being "found out" by less supportive people, I used a pseudonym. I wanted to have the freedom to be myself without having to take responsibility for it. I've been thinking about this as I've been thinking about future posts, and decided that I am an honest person who can't "let me out" if I'm pretending to be someone else, regardless of how anonymity can often grant courage.
As a portrayed they are really accessories for all rrn your in addition to ages of people but rather makes.
Parking here is crazy. If I don't find a spot sometime between 10 A.M. and 3 P.M., it takes me 30-45 minutes to find a spot anywhere to park, and it's usually four or five blocks away from my apartment. I have been impressed with my ability to parallel park though. I didn't know I would be able to get into spots that only had a few inches in front of me and a few inches in back of me, but I've done it several times. It makes me thankful that my car is small.
Ah bet thi teeths glad when thar asleep
All Johnny Burns ever wanted was to be in a band. When he and his best friend Tom Watson founded Heartbreaker, they realised their wildest dreams a hundred times over.
Note: The infamous Battle of Koom Valley between Trolls and Dwarfs may have started when the Trolls gave the Dwarfs a Mountain as a gift. And then tried to confiscate the diamonds the dwarfs mined out of said mountain.
I must be insane
and the day just flew by.
You have a crush on someone and dunno how to express it?
Wi' favours secret, sweet, and precious;
Combine blueberries, lemon zest and juice, and sugar in a stockpot. Heat very slowly over low heat, mashing blueberries with a potato masher or ricer. Once mixture comes to a boil, add seeds from vanilla bean and mix in thoroughly.
4. Meanwhile, prepare the pork fat back. Blanch in boiling water for 1 to 2 minutes until firm. Drain and cool. Dice finely into pieces about the size of rice grains. Set aside.
But what we have here is an opportunity for some bit of steampunk–serious or otherwise–because the mechanical arts remain unaffected.
I need therapy. Seriously. I love to shop at King Arthur online. This store is my toy store. I have been slowly accumulating their products, and have been experimenting with them. I discovered that the Vital Wheat Gluten really helped my Pioneer Woman Buttered Rosemary Rolls to rise beautifully. The three products that you see pictured above, were going on a maiden voyage for this recipe I'm about to show you. I've used Fleishmann's Rapid Rise Yeast for ages. I decided to buy a bag of SAF Instant yeast, since bread bakers rave about it. Enough product talk... let's talk about yeast. The SAF Instant yeast is supposed to not need any kind of "proofing". That translates, simply, into dissolving the yeast with some sort of sugar-- honey or sugar, for example and waiting for it to "foam". I think people are afraid of killing the yeast. One more important thing-- I store my yeast in the refrigerator (some people use the freezer) and check the expiration date! Yeast should be live!
When to use: Pretty obvious, isn’t it?
So I started shopping around a little more.
With speculation layered upon speculation, the task of peering into the murky waters of probability to make an assessment of damages is something that is clearly not undertaken lightly. As far as a game of pin the tail on the donkey goes, the court clearly does its best to try and bring a semblance of rationality to an inherently arbitrary assessment of chances and possibilities in an alternative reality.
Please take a moment to visit his store to see all the wonderful digistamps he has and hopefully purchase a few to add to your digistamp collection.
Their fate is so much less horrible in the Charles Perrault version than it is with the Brothers Grimm.
A British officer who might be willing to accept the affections of a pretty young stranger would often remain silent about his work. Sometimes, ship fitters and the merchants who supplied them were more lucrative targets.
Does that sound okay to you?
The driving license showed models of cars to be introduced in the following months, enabling the child to look out for these ask them by name. This is used to drive the repeat purchases of Hot Wheels and the consumer pull will eventually make the retailers stock the products. Also, along with the driving license the child was given a journey card encouraging him to note down how many miles did he drive. This brought the brand closer to the child.
can clearly announce our thoughts and recite our information.
It's to be expected, I guess. We'd bought it when they first came out, and we use it ALL the time - every day for 4 hours +. So for it to be acting up now is really not a surprise.
I know that we’re all super nerdy social outcasts here who probably believe that ostracism is necessarily the worst thing anybody can do and it makes you basically Hitler, but if we aren’t willing to set and enforce clear boundaries for how members are going to treat each other, we’re going to lose members anyway. So whom would you rather lose? People who refuse to cut down on their prejudiced conduct, or people who refuse to subject themselves to that prejudiced conduct? We can’t have both of them. We really cannot.
And if that isn't enough - (remember my plan is to 'go out in a blaze of glory') - today - with just two weeks until my student art show, my 6th graders (who are already making GIANT seed packages to plant on stakes in the 'garden') with only 4 art class periods before the art show, dove into other big stuff for the garden: a ladybug, a caterpillar, a snake, a giant pea pod with peas inside, and ...? Speed art, anyone? Papier-mache! - YAHOO!
The first time was back in early September. I was meandering through the aisles, loading up on cake baking supplies and snacks for my son’s lunch box. His birthday was coming, and he had just started full-day school days. I was weepy as I was wandering, still in the thick of the “letting go” process. It was hard for me to stomach him being under someone else’s charge, and apparently it was hard for him, too, as he was exhibiting some spikes in bad behavior. I wanted to wrap him up and tuck him away from the world, but I knew that I would not be able to shield him from “real life” forever. It made my heart crack.
So, my words to you fellow runners: If you have not run Big Sur, plan to do it. It is both a horribly challenging marathon course and a beautiful run. This year’s running had crazy, biting winds, fog, cold, heat, sun — just about every extreme you can imagine. And, then you have the ascents and descents that make the course so challenging.
To balance the salty water, a sweetener should be a part of the brine. Use sugar, brown sugar, molasses, honey or even agave nectar.
I looked over my shoulder to the co-pilot who had now become the pilot. I wonder if he’d notice if I slipped in a quick massage and a facial just after checkout. He is a patient man.
I think the hearts are from Panduro. They were red,
and hit my boyfriend's car on the passenger side
Malaysia’s Barisan Nasional government has caused massive human rights abuses and corruption via the 2 classes of citizenship which amount to APARTHEID. The Bumiputra with Special Privileges vs non-Bumiputra dual system of citizenships are an abuse that the UN Secretary General Ban Ki Moon, as well as the Human Rights Council (which should boot Malaysia out of the council for allowing) need to address post haste, including the denial of rights to apostasy for Muslim citizens of all races. Meanwhile advanced psychiatric technologies and drugs are also being used to suppress peaceful activists in Malaysia as well, effectively destroying the lives of would be politicians ready tp bring Malaysia to the first world. Will the UN and the UN’s major patron nations in the first world, backed by supposedly freedom propagating NATO ensure that the rights of all abused persons, are corrected with justice and reparations made to the citizens and activists living in Malaysia?
Wherever I am
There comes a point when it's time to take it to the next level. Perhaps you've already started sewing more pieces by hand, or have learned a neckline facing trick, or a hem method that gives a perfect finish. When you're ready to really "kick it up a notch," though, it's time to get "Couture Sewing Techniques ," by Claire B. Shaeffer.
I had butternut squash and asparagus in my crisper and decided that they would be perfect in a turkey soup. Crisp corn, garlic, mushrooms and a pinch of Jamaican allspice made this a wonderful sweet and savory soup the whole family loved.
Are you all swooning with me right now?! I am SO impressed with how perfect her solution was! I mean, totally an AMAZING and INSPIRATIONAL use of space!! Sure got my brain wheels spinning!
The Mission of the School Library
It matters on another level as well. Girls have to have confidence in their decisions and, importantly, have the knowledge and confidence to say no. As a gender, females are stereotyped into being docile and acquiescent and people-pleasers. It's important that we teach our daughters not only how to say no, but let them. Let them say no and assert their independence on important things. If we tell them to say no, but don't let them, are they going to be able to say no when someone is treating them or someone else badly or unfairly? We need to teach them to stand for themselves and that their opinions and desires matter.
You grab it's little tail and use his little front feet or the space behind his little ears to grab and pull out a hot oven rack and you will not burn your most precious dainty fingers.
Gregory: he’s seems utterly confused
I’ve compiled this page of links to websites with great information and practical advice to help you achieve your goal. I will add further links as I come across them and welcome your comments and link recommendations. Just click on any of the descriptions below that you are interested in to go straight the relevant website page.
Now if I could just get on that Christmas shopping things would be peachy. Until then, I'll be living it up for the remainder of the week in Las Vegas, work related. Wonder if I can find some grand Elvis souvenirs to put under the tree! A girl could only dream.
“I am such a fan of Jessica Sanchez.. Tama ang judges. She is one of the best singers in America,” he added.
Effects: narcoleptic trance, programming by suggestion
Each grain is like a mouth sealed
I underestimated the passion that CSUSB and its fans had for its basketball team. Surprisingly, it felt like a home game for the Coyotes at times. After taking a small lead late in the second half, the arena erupted with the cheers and celebrations of the Coyotes faithful. It was almost deafening.
It’s amazing how quickly one can fall out of the regular routine, and how hard it is to get back into the swing of things again. Okay, just a few more days and I should have it . . . until the weekend of the 18th when it’s four days of training again, then a show the following weekend. Um. . . May might just be a bit crowded.
Live long on it
What is a parent to do?
Escarole is a wonderful, slightly bitter green, that most people may be familiar with eating raw in salads, but which becomes meltingly tender when cooked. Italians have many recipes for braised and sauteed escarole and it is a traditional ingredient in Greens and Beans and Italian Wedding Soup. We love escarole so much that it is a regular part of our home garden. It's easy to grow, but it is the one vegetable that invites slugs into our usually very dry, sandy soil, garden environment. Escarole grows thickly at the base, so between the slug issue and the many grains of sand that hide in its crevasses, this vegetable requires thorough rinsing and several soaks before it's ready for the cooking pot.
Confined by a cage.
They are investigating the assault as a hate crime.
#10. Brittney Reese – Knows she has hops.
Then we installed the mounting brackets. I'm not sure on their exact purpose but I believe it's to protect the wall from getting damaged from the cords. Once they're inserted, the screws are used to pull these little flap thingys towards the wall to hold it in place.
She was known as “The Beautiful Cigar Girl,” but the 1841 murder of 20-year-old Mary Rogers remains one of the most baffling unsolved murders in the history of New York City.
VSTYA Blog (vstyablog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Isn’t it cool to have an idea, design it, execute it, and make it into something tangible? I am always pleased to see my doodles printed out and now I’m seeing them on….STUFF!
Meanwhile her boss, advertising mogul Everett Edward Horton, patiently waits his chance to woo Hopkins. He hasn't even 'gotten to first base' with her and as is the case so often with such lame duck lovers who are never quite all the way spurned or accepted, feels it's his duty to attempt to shoo the other boys away but of course he's little more than a fly at a picnic thinking it's the other way around. That is until he eventually 'wins' by default, even though he's too beholden to Eaglebauer to give her a, well, it's a semi-long story.
So there it is, thanks for looking. I'm about to go swimming with my family! yay!! Have a great day and hope your weather is nicer than it is here!! Thanks for looking!
It is cost effective to buy new , inexpensive lace and dye yourself to age. You can utilise your re-inkers to due lace. I prefer to slightly dampen the lace before adding re-inker as unless you want the colour to be intense it is always easier to build up the colour than it is to reduce the colour although if any mistakes are made quickly run the lace under the water tap.
‘I hope that you feel like justice was served for you today,’ Hawk said. ‘It’s heartbreaking and to say I’m sorry is not enough. But I hope you both have very full and happy lives. Congratulations.’
Personality: Neat- 7, Outgoing- 4, Active- 3, Playful- 4, Nice- 7
Thanks to everyone who listened to our very first radio Podrophenia last night... and special thanks for all of you who took the time to send messages into the studio - over 50 received in an hour!
It was a sad day for me when the course finally came to an end last week. I really enjoyed the course. If BCIT tuition for the course wasn’t so expensive, I would take it again… as long as Miriam is teaching. I feel the need to keep up with the skills that I have just grown comfortable with. Guess that means I will need to find a way to practice.
Day 3
ME - Drat! No signal.
Blessings~~~
Those two strikes take The Gorgon down a couple pegs. I thought it was entertaining in spite of some flaws, but not a classic. Hammer definitely did traditional Universal monster much better.
A few days later, after sending the letter to the fair-haired boy and excitedly claiming he "looked" at him during breakfast, George spots a crow flying over the blue sky, which he says to William is bad luck. Sure enough, later that afternoon, George is knifed in the showers by McArdle, who flees the scene while William screams for help. A guard comes onto the scene and orders William and others to line up and face the wall.
1288 D-I/23/1998. Television interview with Mike Flannery, on William J. Clinton’s problems, Channel 2, Chicago, Illinois. See Item C-1998(11), above, p. 109, n. 21. See, also, Items C-1998(6) and C-1998(7), above, and Item E-IX/10/1998, below.
Cambodian commuters. We saw many trucks like this loaded to the gills with people. Not unusual at all to see 30 in one truck. Packed in like sardines, hanging over the edges. So unsafe, but people there drive pretty slow, so I guess you just hang on and no one falls out.
Add this to the dry ingredients and beat on low till well incorporated.
Other posts like this one:
Look, look! I mean, read, READ!
Author: Artefact
And you can listen to the Peter Williams vs Bart Ehrman debate. That link contains a link to the audio of the debate as well as my snarky summary. It’s very snarky.
Founded in the early 1980's, Shas claims to represent the interests of traditionally religious Mizrahi and Sefardi Israelis (Jews of Arab, Mediterranean, and "Oriental," extraction). It pushes for social programs, bread subsidies, and the bolstering religious opinion in legal and political matters.
Could I bend my knee? No.
At times I feel all alone in this, although in reality I am far from alone because my fiancé is so supportive and has literally been catering to me during this new process, but when he is at work or at the gym I get so lonely and my anxiety kicks in. At times I feel like nobody cares, but they do. I feel like I can’t do anything for myself anymore, but in reality I can. My emotions are running wild! Some advice for future moms-to-be: You are going to have so many doubts, and you are going to become extremely moody and sad at times, you are going to nag all the time, and your partner might become frustrated at times….but just remember you’re not crazy, I am feeling it too! Make your partner aware that all women experience this during pregnancy and he must FORCE himself to ignore it, think about the future, and stay supportive! I have to say my partner has been so strong these past 5 weeks, I have been attacking him and I feel horrible, but he knows how much I love him and he is sticking it through! Now that’s a man!
Thank you for that, Summer School.
Thank you followers and visitors for your support and encouragement.
When we make goals together and work toward them together life doesn't seem like such a burden. He asked me how can he do that for me here (at home). I saw he was thinking how am I going to do these things for you,don't I already help out enough,don't I have enough on my plate?
Close your eyes and imagine the floor beneath your feet—cool hardwood maybe. Or softly warm and carpeted. Sit down and lift your feet up off of it and imagine you can never put them down on it again. Ever. See how quickly the feeling of the floor fades? See how much you want to feel it again? How lost you feel with no place to put your feet?
Also, if you happen to love those green fruity chunky things. Add them. I won't be eating it:)
Is my imagination getting away from me a little?
1 big bunch purslane
the bunnies mould which i forgotten during CNY!! bought this specially since its the Bunny Year... but forgot about it coz the mould was not in sight... hence my earlier post was only fishes and pineapples...
Now, doesn't that make you want to go back and see what all of our amazing DT and our awesome challenge participants came up with? If you click HERE you can do just that! Thank you to all of our participants!
Ms Vogel’s behaviour reminds me of a fable told by Old Melonhead, the semi-mythical ape later copied by Aesop. It’s about a female spider who is visited by two male suitors. The first one approaches her timidly and gently taps one of her hairy legs.
So I took my professor’s challenge. I resolved stolidly that I would give up worrying for Lent.
About thy crest.
Oh, I’m sorry if the real Rex stood up and upset your toolbox. Here’s a wrench for you, which I would throw if I had the gripping capacity: I’m going to go back into hiding if you don’t start setting the record straight! Before we go creating a hierarchy that involves portraying some of us as suffering from relative dwarfism, just ask yourself which came first buddy: the nano- or the tyrano-? T.R. just had the good fortune to be discovered first, probably because he’s not as good at hiding as I am. There’s really no other reason aside from pure dumb luck coupled with poor stealth skills to explain how he’s been capturing headlines and imaginations for over a century. Let's face it, as some of you have finally figured out, T.R.’s lazy; it’s well established that he was more scavenger than predator, and was usually the slowest one among us. They even had to use a stunt double to chase that Jeep in “Jurassic Park”! Hell, the only thing T.R. ever really accomplished was letting himself go and putting on about 14,000 pounds. You people are only fascinated with him in the same way you’re fascinated with that one-ton man in Mexico who they had to move with a crane.
By following a few simple guidelines, I am better able to "balance the home in homeschool" and ensure that the freedoms afforded while homeschooling will lead to giving what is best to my children. And doesn't every parent want what is best for their child?
Romance may dip a tiny bit into the dark side of life, just for dramatic contrast, but the fundamental assumption of the nature of reality behind the Romance is the existence of the HEA, that it's real, permanent, attainable, and a final ending. You get to win.
The day started mildly early, because I heard the dog barking at the bin men at around 9am this morning, or some time like that .. I was so tired I didn’t even think to look at a watch or a clock of some description, I just thought .. sod it, I’m going back to sleep .. I am not getting up now. I eventually got up around 11am when Dad said he was going for a run.
Lagunitas IPA Petaluma, California, India Pale Ale, 5.7% abv
1 tablespoon meringue powder
There was a twenty minute break in the conversation here… Like I said, my therapist is in a third world country; her internet connection is sporadic and sometimes non-existent. She has gone out of her way to maintain reception for this conversation.
The Celtics vs the Raptors may not have been the best game to go see for my first one..
But it needs more chocolate.
I told myself that this would be easy. It was purely for medical training purposes. I was far-enough removed from infertility testing and treatment cycles to let this actually "matter" to me. I didn't even bring my chart in, because, well, I'm not charting.
white, worn and tattered
Then I heal, a little.
- Had the "3 week cold" that was going around
(Note: For an express processing, the fee is slightly higher - of course. Go figure. I actually over-heard the fella in front of me for a collection the next day.)
TEQLT Blog (teqltblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Harnish will be flown to Newport Beach, California, where they’ll throw beach parties, parades, and regattas in his honor. Then Disneyland. He will drag the infield during an Anaheim Angel’s baseball game (they won’t let him throw out the first pitch because that would make him relevant). After a banquet held in his honor he will receive his award. Instead of the Heisman, he’ll get the Lowsman trophy — a statue of a football player with a clueless stare as he’s fumbling the football.
I then owned a successful driving school franchise for a number of years.
- Independent Adjustable footrests
The Law Society Gazette warns of courts experiencing “a huge increase in litigants fighting their cases themselves” and quoted several judges expressing concern that such cases take twice as long as people who have to be helped to navigate the unfamiliar legal process.
All 36 colours are available (as well as the clear embossing ink) - so rush in quick to get them at this great price!
“Surprisingly, even though you’ve shattered my illusion of your beauty, Mr. Monitor, yes.”
“Some people have speculated that the CDF renewal of the Leadership Conference of Women Religious was prompted by the LCWR and Network support of Obamacare in opposition to the bishops,” she observes. “That may have been the last straw, but the CDF move was a long time coming,” she tells me.
* 3/4 cup mild-flavored olive oil
I don’t have to.
Beatles She loves you UK
The Female acquaintance smiled at me. Although, I’m not so sure that she felt that I really answered her question.
The life-cycle graph is really just another “at a glance” view of the product portfolio situation and context. In figure 2 the majority of the business units revenues are derived from product lines that are in decline in terms of product life cycle. (We are assuming a common product life-cycle curve in this example.) 25% of the products lines revenues are based on mature product lines while 30% of revenues are based on product lines in growth phases. Obviously, in the out years this business unit will have issues maintaining profitable revenue growth – or it already may be a reality. One caveat here: this is not an absolute analysis (i.e. its both qualitative and quantitive) and there are the grey areas between product maturity and decline for example. Use this framework as a guide in your overall analysis and context setting.
Total cost of the outfit -
I believe this moment was especially sweet with a priceless fee
Stamps: Stampin' Up! - Medallion, Sentiments
“Blueberry pancakes. And what’s that? A triple shot latte?”
Naturally a black woman in her thirties calling a teen aged white man a “Skinny dicked white boy” was not viewed in the same light.
See you in 5
06. Riding At Midnight - 3:20
Spoon the cheese mixture into piping bag or large sealable bag with one corner cut off. Squeeze into each hollowed out jalapeno until its full. Wrap each pepper with a piece of bacon and secure it with a toothpick or you can put several on a skewer. Stand the peppers up in a baking dish. If your dish is too large to keep all the peppers upright then crumple up some foil to line the sides. You want the cheese end on top (up). Bake for 30 minutes or until the bacon looks done and the peppers seem tender.
*Special sections on: Walking In ways that are pleasing to God; Our God Is...; Godly Character; Passing It On; Moms in the Bible; Questions Kids Ask; and Wonderful Counselor, covering issues moms face from the perspective of a Christian therapist
1/4 cup pine nuts
Again, I chose this beer because of the packaging. Breckenridge Brewery always has these fantastic retro poster style beer labels.
My feeling is that the imagery of dreams is so hard to remember and capture in the medium of film that directors often tend to fill in their movie dreams with what they believe dreams should have. There is also the reality that dreams created in movies still need to fulfill the requirements of the story, something I would not necessarily penalize the films for. The dreams in Lynch's "Mulholland Drive" are shaped just enough to work emotionally, while the dreams in his "Inland Empire" resulted in three hours of tedious and repetitious wankery that is not necessarily more believable as a dream. However, let us go one layer deeper for "Inception" to get at what bothers me about the film's central notion. Do our ideas always come from our dreams?
Possible: Art Direction, Makeup
There are increasing signs that traditional banking and other financial services are adapting to this new technology and new market. Banks offering mobile money services are encouraging people who may have some money left over from remittances to hold it in “mobile wallets,” basic electronic accounts linked to a mobile phone.
Speaking of Moon, like all great Who records, and perhaps as much as any of them, Kieth Moon sounds like the best rock and roll drummer ever on this record. With all of Townsend's self-aggrandizing, sometimes you forget how important Moon was to this band.
The paper I used is ReCollections from Michael's and the ribbon is from my ribbon stash :)
New Bronson? I'll have an order of that... extra hot sauce on it please...
4. Spread in greased 13 x 9 inch pan. Bake for 35 minutes (do not overbake).
“Barack Obama has decided to revive a plot the Saudi Crown Prince hatched in 2002. Abdullah bin Abdulaziz had suggested Israel beat a retreat to the pre-1967 borders, in return for the recognition, whatever that means, of the Arab world.” …
I ordered the Seafood Trio: "Tender shrimp, sesame-crusted sushi-grade ahi tuna and cedar plank salmon." The salmon was by far my favorite.
"Forever in Blue Jeans" by Neil Diamond
Construction of a Special Relationship Between Women and Nature,” Ethics and
Maybe not, though.
Here’s the song:
You probably read the headlines recently of the teacher who left his wife, children, and teaching career in order to move in with a former 18-year old student. Their reasoning was “We’re following our hearts.”
But the number wasn't so scary because it was completely arbitrary. I didn’t know at the time how much I actually spent in a day. Nor did I know how much money I’d spend in the future. But it was somewhere to start. And the math was easy enough to keep my pencil on the paper, fooling with numbers. So I continued.
I'm totally ok with this.
So yes, glee and happiness, and I can’t wait til I have the time to read again…
If you're looking for something shorter try The Still Point by Amy Sackville. Julia has grown up believing in the stories of her family's long-lost heroic Arctic explorer, Edward Mackley and the devoted life-time wait of his wife. As she sorts through relics in the attic, Julia discovers all is not as she had believed. This story weaves together themes of loss, self-delusion, betrayal and discovery, with alternating threads of heat and cold, idleness and endeavour, creating a wonderful whole.
At my annual check up I asked my doctor about it and if I could be referred to a physical therapist. He hesitated before saying that most all of his patients that have run marathons have had bone fractures. Because my pain was bilateral, he wasn’t as concerned about that being the problem, but he wanted to check to be sure.
Ididnt find that but I did see on St. Johns a massive amount of tree limbs large enough to have closed the street between Bedford av and Rogers. The tree debris seems to have severally damaged a white car and caused the B45 bus to be rerouted.
1/4 POUND OF DICED HAM (I USED REGULAR BOILED DELI HAM)
But, on the whole, a spanking
Embellishments: Ribbon, Silver string, Fern punch CB folder rhinestones, white gel pen.
When someone learns that I didn't drive while my kids were growing up they ask ... how did you do that? Well it was a team effort - grateful for a awesome dad on the team and much creativity. We rode the bus often, walked, they took their bikes, and at times even though it isn't easy, we asked friends. We found creative ways to help and contribute without being able to be the driver. I used to have a play group for the kids of the moms that were carpooling my kids. As our kids were older, we paid a driver to help us out as well.
and what a crazy month it has been.
So, step one: I sanded.. Most often if a piece is in good condition without chipping paint, I will prime right away without sanding. In this case, there were several chunks of paint missing that would have left little pot holes. Also, I was curious to see what kind of wood was hiding underneath there in the event that I decided to stain instead. I used an electric sander on all flat surfaces without any details (the top, and drawer fronts). I used very fine sand paper and hand sanded all other areas that were rounded at all. I completely avoided the hand carved detailing. If sanding is necessary on ornate details, you can use steel wool.
REMEMBER: no matter how many documents you need to review, you have to read every word of every document (lease, easement, agreement, etc.). Make notes of things you don’t understand or need to clarify. Then give a report to your supervising attorney. He or she will review documents as well, but your notes will create a road map and help to expedite the decision. Keep in mind that you are on the front lines of the due diligence process and the items you flag will show your diligence and assist your attorney in making the right decision. There is no substitute for thorough due diligence and it is a paralegal’s role to assist during it.
Lorenza
5
Into the folder cabinet,
Anyway, as a self-protective measure, I figured I should go remove my previous blog’s blog posts. Partly is to let go of that blog, and focus on this one, another… well, I’ll just remain silent about it.
The flower is tatted with Size 40 Tatilicious "Esmeralda"
The other quilt is from Quick Quilts and there aren't great pictures online, but it's the cover picture from this issue of the magazine.
Me: "Oh no! I'm on a date. But don't worry...no...I'll pick you up. Are you sure you're alright though?"
Political Principles
Two thirds of guns where Mexican authorities seek to match serial numbers to US records turn out to have come from the United States, reports the Texas Tribune, news punctuated by a recent arrest of a US trucker smuggling 268,000 rounds of ammunition southward. My friend Alice Tripp from the Texas State Rifle Association correctly points out that that doesn't mean that 2/3 of guns used by Mexican cartels were illegally smuggled from the US. But I don't discount the 2/3 number as much as she because the two other major sources of cartel weaponry also involve guns originally made in the United States: Most prominently, the United States spent decades funneling weapons to fight proxy wars against Marxists and nationalists throughout Central America right up until the Cold War ended. Less well publicized, defectors from the Mexican military and police often take weaponry with them when they go which was often purchased from US manufacturers, secured through US aid programs, etc.. So even the weapons that weren't illegally smuggled into Mexico often ultimately, originally came from the United States, often by perfectly legal, even US-government sponsored means. Gun smuggling southward is a real thing and a serious concern, but even if the flow of smuggled US guns stopped tomorrow, there are plenty of other sources to ensure that won't be the pivotal element that stops the killing.
If Google’s hypothesis is correct — that people will trust content from people in their social circles more than they trust random search results — social search will be even more effective than traditional targeted ads or SEO techniques.
I am leaving you with some photos of this years Wisteria - Glicine.
Although the path to purchase may appear unclear as consumers conduct the shopping process across multiple channels, Pollak encouraged mobile marketers to think about factors such as a consumer’s distance from a store and the days and times when mobile usage spikes. For example, tablet usage peaks during after-work hours and smartphone usage spikes during weekend days. Connecting and strategizing based on those statistics will help mobile marketers provide more targeted and personalized campaigns akin to the marketing experiences consumers are accustomed to on the web.
the singular
Both of us said “Yes!” (laughing away in excitement)
This was officially the lowest blow."
This touring exhibition is organized by Chris Uhlenbeck and accompanied by the catalogue Yoshitoshi: Masterpieces from the Ed Freis Collection, Hotei Publishing, 2011. The exhibition at Pacific Asia Museum is supported by Toyota Financial Services, the Los Angeles County Arts Commission, Sid and Betsey Tyler, and Roy and Maurine Oban.
Years later Mancini contacts Agent Russo and identifies himself as her worse nightmare and tips her off about a crime he is about to commit to set her up. He makes it clear that he can see her through her apartment window and has been watching her. She becomes determined to discover who the caller is and why she is being targeted.
Alpaca cuteness is all in the hair.
To leave the world a bit better whether by a healthy child,
I'm now recalling when my devo ministry began...with only six of my precious ministry teammates in drama, growing now to many I don't even know personally. Then Selah the blog was started to expand it further still. Since then, my readers walked with me through screaming toddler tantrums, revelations of being a better wife and homemaker, taking care of aging family members, numerous deaths in the family, tales of schooling my kids at home, major ministry decisions and the fleshing out of my spiritual life, growing from legalism to faith-filled freedom. From my perspective, the spiritual years have flown by too.
Friends, get ready for a walk into the basement. The market is going down.
The bundle was a lovely fat quarter pack, and all sorts of goodies like a chocolate Santa, a plaque that says "Believe", an apron pattern (which will come in handy) and a lovely ornament for the tree. She said the kids helped her pick out the items for the package. They did a terrific job! Double kudos for the great hand lotion. I love the smell. The tissue cozy jumped right into my purse and is great. But truly, it was all perfect. Thanks so much!
It amazes me that anyone wants to read anything that I write here. This is so much a place for just letting my thoughts roam, for thinking through problems, and (I admit it) for pontificating a bit. It’s been a kick, writing this blog, and I want to thank all of you for indulging my whims and whimseys.
GA Eyes to Kill #2 e/s (Red Lust) - to line
Here's what I like to stock up on:
When I first read this in our letter to the Hebrews, I was a bit confused because it sounded like God was talking and so far as I have ever been told, the writer of Hebrews was not a prophet so it was good that I have a concordance in my Bible.
The National Trust Collections website is drawn from the Trust’s national inventory - it has taken nearly fifteen years and the work of hundreds of Trust staff, volunteers and contractors to research, catalogue and photograph the collections and develop the database – and work is on-going.
That said, my recommendation for neotame is similar to that for aspartame, which is: avoid it at all costs if you care about your health. Neotame is like aspartame on steroids, so while you want to avoid both, neotame appears to be more toxic. One way of avoiding all artificial sweeteners is to purchase foods bearing the USDA 100% Organic label. I don’t believe there’s any reason to suspect organic foods will contain neotame.
And it turns out I was not completely wrong. A read through of a helpful compiled list of America’s prestigious ‘Fortune 500′ companies’ slogans and mission statements showed essentially the same message being played out in 500 different formats, with variable methods and addendums. AGCO promise “profitable growth through superior customer service, innovation, quality and commitment”. American Standard’s mission is to “be the best in the eyes of our customers, employees and shareholders.” And AutoNation aims to be “America’s best run, most profitable automotive retailer”.
Oh for a complete conquest of self especially render us insensible to praise,
According to Al-Raas’ fiancee, Zainab Ahmed, Ablonczy sent a letter saying “We have been advised by officials and like-minded countries that quiet diplomacy is the best approach as we seek to support and assist him.”
I have worked off and on with those numbers and they just won't balance in the right places.
I was recently in Bangladesh for an internship with the Grameen Bank, a Nobel Peace Prize (2006) winning microfinance institution. Frankly, it was my curiosity and I like to believe destiny, that led me to Bangladesh. As a student of Finance who sometimes got frustrated with how in-the-box it can all be, the term ‘Microfinance’- one that I had never heard during the course of my education intrigued me the more I read about it. Before I knew it, I was off to Bangladesh, with an open mind, wanting to learn everything I could about the Grameen Bank. Before I made the decision to go, I asked former interns about their experiences, and the advice was mixed. Personally, the experience was an eye opener, and to anyone considering this internship, I would say that this is an educational internship. The kind that requires an open mind, curiosity, flexibility and willingness to learn- not only about microfinance, but also the subtleties of a culture that is very different from the developed world.
Overall Fallout: New Vegas is a very good game. While it doesn’t do a great deal of new stuff it delivers a worthwhile experience that will tide fans of the series over until Fallout 4 arrives.
A staunch supporter of teenage vandalism, and hooliganism in general, I found myself nodding along in steadfast agreement while each act of impish rascality was being implemented. The fact that the girls, an unfairly neglected group when it comes to nonsensical criminality, were deeply involved the anarchistic bravado that goes on in this film caused me to nod even harder.
1-2 T Dijon mustard
3. Texts that make me smile.
One person could have leafleted the entire Ward of circa 15,000 houses in that timescale and still have time to spare.
“Does the car have any tires?” The disembodied voice asked instantly raising my suspicions that I was missing some important piece of information.
There promises to be 12 of our beers including our entire core range available as well as the first two Nerotype brews, of which Brew #2 'Columbus' is a national exclusive to the event as is 'Valencia' our new 4% Citra session beer.
Public Library
But enough about her music. Today I picked up a really cute wallet from her L.A.M.B. brand at the Neiman Marcus Last Call outlet. Their prices are definitely ridiculous but the wallet was cute and I've been searching for one just like it. The original tag was marked $98 and the "reduced" price was $70. Are you kidding me? You HAVE to be kidding me! But needless to say, I bought it.
We do pre-screen some movies we aren't sure about before we let them watch them, but we let them watch almost anything at the end of the day.
Art always looks better on the wall in a beautiful room! I always wanted to show my art like this...it gives people a better sense of how the painting might look on their own wall. Sooooooo, with the magic of the internet, I searched for rooms that would suit my style of art, downloaded the photo, then using photoshop, I placed my artwork on the wall. LOVE how they turned out!
photosource: blog.cessoviedo.com
Like I said in the introduction, I’ve always been an indie artist, managing everything on my own, I think the future is a lot about that for me & for a lot of artists. The music world is changing you can watch behind with nostalgia or try to reinvente yourself everyday, I prefer this solution.
say, “Now, Mary, you can’t let Martha do all the work by herself. Get
Except, action is not always straightforward - and waiting on will of gods is frustratingly slow, when the wrongs before her are so very clear! One strike, and she can right wrongs, restore balances, and clear the way for how things should be. A daughter of Death surely knows what her father-god desires, doesn't she? Unfortunately, life and death -- and finally, love -- turn out to be much more complicated than Ismae could have possibly dreamed.
Seeing the damage all around him, Kendzierski and other members of the close-knit Ellicott City community began brainstorming ways to raise money for their neighbors who'd been hit the hardest.
Last time I wrote about the market, I was struck by the camaraderie of the marketeers and the strength of the social network they've developed, a network that includes local merchants as well as the stall-tenders and their customers. This time out, I realized that almost every vendor at the market is using it to try out their wares for the first time, to experiment, to go out on a limb. Much as Frank and Jason noted explicitly when I talked to them two weeks ago, Stacey, Kevin, and Amanda all mentioned that this was their first time selling their work in this sort of context, and that they were enjoying the experience. Flea markets rarely make their way into discussions of the entrepreneurial spirit, but right here in Crown Heights, in the middle of a recession that has by no means spared Brooklyn, a whole host of neighbors are making their first foray into their own businesses, engaging their passions and getting themselves out there.
In fact, the authors found that energy drinks caused twice as much damage to teeth as sports drinks.
#2: If your oven is like mine and gets hot easily, I would suggest bringing the temp down to 160C and increase baking time to 12 minutes. Be sure to keep an eye out as the cornflakes will crisp pretty fast.
Fareda: Writing.
Kate: I love a good "love to hate" character! Is there a particular theme of the Starfire Angel series that spoke to you personally as you were writing it?
On the drive to the conference we started arguing pretty heavily over something so small and insignificant. That is usually how our arguments begin...over something stupid. When we arrive at the church, I was determined to not go in; we were going home; I was not going in there with him, no way jose!
Love and sex are not the same thing; this is something some people never learn. Sex without love is just physical. Love without sex can be pure, spiritual and true. But sex with someone you love unequivocally, can be gentle and tender, hot and wild, comfortable or simply sublime.
Even outside the church, I could see sexism, such as when Hillary Rodham Clinton was castigated because she said she didn't "stay home and bake cookies." To hell with all of that, I decided. I'd live on sandwiches, ramen, and take-out. I didn't need to keep a home; I needed to keep a suitcase packed.
sunnier than the sidewalk.
I'm planning a small fiesta with some drinks and appetizers in celebration of Cinco de Mayo so I'll be sure to post some pictures next week to show you how it came out.
Kasztner was a wealthy and prominent member of the Hungarian Jewish community. The fate of the Hungarian Jews is particularly tragic, as over 90% of them died … all in the last year of the war. Hungary didn’t come under Nazi control until the summer of 1944. Elie Wiesel was among this group. Many Holocaust survivors still around were from this group (simply because overall survival rates were a lot better if you were in the Nazi system for a year rather than six like the Polish Jews). In fact, the majority of Chassidic “courts” that are large players in contemporary Judaism (like the Satmars) are Hungarian. Anyway this is tangential.
4) Turn off the heat completely.
After that, orders went out across Anatolia and other parts of the empire for for a `temporary relocation' of the Armenians. People were told to only bring what they could carry. The Armenians complied and were "escorted" by Turkish guards in what became death marches.
On behalf of Council Member James, we express our gratitude towards the Fulton Street BID Steering Committee, Pratt Area Community Council, numerous local business owners, and Mayor Bloomberg in assisting the efforts to strengthen Clinton Hill/Fort Greene's vibrant business community.
Atlantic Brewing Company Coal Porter
This Big Lie ignores the fact that there is no relationship between carbon dioxide (CO2) and the climate. CO2 reacts to climate change. It does not drive it. The Big Lie ignores the fact that the Earth has been cooling for fourteen years.
That seems to have worked - she hasn't made any more attempts.
Virginia 6-Mar 49 43 0 0 3
25 Galactic Symposium - Money
At this point I should add that I am in favour of the scalpel over the sledgehammer, but for pragmatic, not moral reasons. I would like each and every dictator on the planet trembling in his boots at the thought of a scud missile dropping on his head over breakfast, rather than having time to construct and elaborate system of human shields and underground bunkers.
Thobani Ngqulunga and Stephanie Saville, The Witness
What really made this stand out though were the characters. Every single character in this script is memorable. I can’t BEGIN to tell you how rare this is. From the wife to Roger to the nurse to “The Arsonist” to the big man in charge, Ambrose, to the military men Ambrose hires (Arroyo and Vickrey) to the even bigger man in charge, Beau. This is the area that really separates the top dogs from the lap dogs. Strong writers know how to make their characters unique. Newbies don’t put any effort into character creation, therefore it’s rare for any of their characters to stand out.
My original plan, incidentally, had been to watch Four Flies on Grey Velvet, but my bootleg (purchased before Mya Communication announced their official DVD) was nearly unwatchable. Very disappointing.
I’ll tell you why I don’t read
This year brought us a nice combination of challenges and changes, mostly welcome.
I remember as a young child standing in the middle of a library, overwhelmed by the rows and rows of books that towered high above my head. I loved the smell of waxed wooden floors and glue. And mostly I loved that I could read any of them that I wanted to! Later as we were in high school and college, many late nights were spent at long wooden tables, laden with the books we’d found to search for information that would amaze our teachers and professors. We didn’t have to own all of the high tech gadgets because the library could help us access whatever we needed. Now, we enjoy bringing our grandchildren to browse the picture book section and visit the story time lady, or find a book to take along for the drive to a distant destination—something we can “get lost” in to help the miles melt away.
It took forever for the cord to stop pulsing. My bum did not want to be in the tub any more and I was so hot. But, it is so much easier to deliver the placenta in the water, and wash away all the ick getting out. When it did stop pulsing the midwife clamped it and Gavin cut the cord. They took sweet baby to dry off while I finished up.
A man pushed a glowing metal bin of roasting sweet potatoes past me.
hello again! i am finally back here in blogland after a long summer off. i hope you missed me!
Whenever I see a recipe involving water, I always wonder what would be the result of substituting beer. As I make my own bread with this "just add water" flour mix, I thought I'd give "beer bread" a shout.
The salesman certainly knew that I was a bit of a Huc-Huc- Huckleberry and offered this:
Dispatched police to respond to a murder call.
Notes: It’s a mouthful. Take a shot before you decide to attempt this one.
“We were on our way to the grocery store and thought, well, since we have all this unwanted gold hidden in our seat cushions, we may as well pull over. We just couldn’t resist the sweaty fat guy with the arrow. Say, how much for my wedding ring?”
The only thing I don’t like about the SoundScoop is that once you glue it together it is entirely less portable because it no longer lays flat. I have plans to give this project a try without using hot glue, but instead using some kind of fastener (heck, a paperclip may even do it) that can be removed so I can more easily carry it with me.”
Allen and Rutan stated that the carrier aircraft would have a wingspan of 385 feet (117 m), making it the largest wingspan of a aircraft ever to fly, and will weigh in at over 1,200,000 pounds (540,000 kg). The aircraft will be powered by 6 × 46,000-66,500lb thrust range Turbine Engines planned to be sourced from a Boeing 747 engines and other components from the 400-series.
We changed the subject and climbed into the back seat for a little hot-loving. Sure does know how to please a man does Rosy Ford.
healthcare. It should also
I am the hybrid of Mexican, Guatemalan, and American cultures. I have lived in South Africa and Togo, West Africa. Currently teaching Literature. I speak three languages. I feel in Spanish and I analyze in English. I'm sure all bilingual babies understand this. Books, music, and writing are the things I lust for. I am known to getting tattoos at the spur of the moment. They all have some reference to my favorite books, somehow.
Emmet Gowin (1 gelatin silver, 1967/1982)
And you’ll prob’ly never see this letter anyway
I must say Gautam Gambhir is the most confident captain I have seen in this format of the game. When asked if he was afraid to play the likes of Chris Gayle and AB de Villiers, he replied with a firm ‘No’. If there is any captain that can take the Knight Riders home, it is definitely Gautam Gambir!
I've had lots of nice World Book Day times and hope you all did too. Thank you for welcoming me, looking after me – and I hope you enjoy my books too.
Exile includes blues artists spanning several decades. There's old country blues by the likes of Sleepy John Estes, Barbecue Bob, Hambone Willie Newbern and Yank Rachell as well as more urban and more contemporary blues greats like Eddie "Cleanhead" Vinson, Clarence "Gatemouth" Brown and Big Mama Thorton.
The union’s bargaining committee will seek out input from affected employees to develop a counter proposal. The issue will not be addressed at the next scheduled meeting.
Her fingers shook as she struggled to push him off, her fingers slipping off him every time she tried to grab a hold of him. His decaying flesh made his body slippery and had to get a firm grip on. Her legs kicked at him wildly as he pulled her off the ground and pinned her to the wall by her shoulders.
So to make this post a little more fun I'm going to share some recent artists I've learned about since we had a contemporary artist presentation to give in printmaking. Maybe it'll inspire some of you lovely readers =)
Holocher said doing a massive amount of coaching allowed him to realized where his passion was. He said he likes everything about the game. In his free time he watches soccer, and he loves to read and talk about the game.
From Goulies and Ghosties and Long-Legged Beasties and things that go Bump in the Night:
But, what is also fascinating is that the use of amphibious aircraft in the form of the Walrus (pictured above) was proven on a small scale during the months of July and August 1940, the lessons were not applied until late 1941 and amphibians were not fully integrated into the system until 1942 – when the Germans had been using dedicated seaplanes for ASR since 1935.
Did they deserve to die? Absolutely not!!
Who only love loves, forget the woman. And the woman would not be forgotten. B. Cami
Someone out there has the coolest job ever. They work at O.P.I. and get to come up with all the cute clever names for the amazing nail polish they create. Yeah, a little jealous. I could come up with super cute clever names. But was I told that this was an option? No. Why? Because someone out there wanted me to be a lawyer or something. Lame. Instead of grad school I could be sitting in a cute office surrounded by nail polish and polka dots. Some of my favorite things.
Another super easy and quick organization project, that could happen in any evening or weekend, when you have two seconds of spare time. And with kids involved, I know those seconds are rare and cherished, but you will find the more you invest in getting organized, the more time you will have with the ones you HEART.
However, you need not worry that the paths will be excessively hard. While demanding, they will not exhaust you - and they will be all the more satisfying for your efforts.
Click HERE for the recipe, which we always follow exactly except for the part about cutting out the doughnuts; we never have the right sizes of round cutters, so we just wing it!
He was almost clinical in his approach. "I'm going to walk around and do a sketch of the property and then take some notes" he said. He also took some photos and asked a few questions like when was the unit renovated and are there any major projects coming up?
Be willing to discuss your reasons for a request.
During my 20 plus years in the pastorate, 10 years helping families
Clean your beaters really well and then beat the egg whites until stiff peaks form. With a large metal spoon, fold 1/3 of the egg whites into the batter. Gently fold in the remaining egg whites, being careful not to overmix.
When we are cracked and broken, it allows God to shine through.
Author, Founder of the Tree of Life Rejuvenation Center, “Conscious Eating, Spiritual Nutrition and the Rainbow Diet”, “Sevenfold Peace, Tachyon Energy: A New Paradigm in Holistic Healing” and “Depression-Free for Life,” raw food advocate.
I came to know about this conference through a friend working at the Aga Kahn Program of the Harvard School of Architecture and Design. The program was a sponsor of the event. My friend, and some of her student-friends, took the pictures of the exhibit included in the post.
Romi
struck dead of a massive heart attack
And these reading comprehension questions on chapters 9 and 10:
By remaking this as a comedy, it no longer runs the risk of trying, and failing, to be a serious remake of something that no adult could ever consider serious in the first place. Science-fiction comedy is a great genre, and there just isn’t enough of it now that Futurama is canceled. Morphing Land Of The Lost into a comedy was a genius decision that completely saved this. It exceeded my expectations so much. Carolyn and I both rate this the same on IMDB, but she rates it one less star on Netflix — possibly because she never watched the original show.
Psalm 46:10
*Food cravings?: No cravings...still love clementines...I think I eat 5-6 a day, just because I know I can eat those without feeling sick. This baby will probably be orange when he's born.
Natalie: I want a big wedding. I want a trane that is long....but not froofy like yours was!! I want it to cover my face. I want a long dress with sleeves.
Sorry if I’m lowering the tone, but it’s something I can ignore no longer. Why do French men have to pee everywhere? Coming from England where toilets are separate and everyone always uses them, it’s one of those niggling things about living in France that you have to learn to live with. Are the French alone in this pastime or are the Brits the only ones with an aversion to peeing in public?
Linton ... Emmanuel Bobadilla
In order to do that effectively, you can't just say they're friendly or shoehorn friendly banter that's at odds with their characters. You have to craft characters that work together, that have complimentary strengths and workable differences. An group of people working together needs to be a team in real life with everyone contributing from their strong suits. In a novel, this is also true, whether the team is a pair or a dozen key players (with different goals and personalities) that make the story go.
I have not been able to keep the free downloads on this blog due to the cost of the server for storing the files. Instead I have invested that money into the new website with the hope of making a little Christmas shopping money while still giving my e-friends great old-time Christmas music fun. You will notice that for your $12.99 per CD, each CD is packed with music. Most of them have so many tracks that I could not put another track on it. Organizing the music into CDs was sometimes a challenge because I would have more tracks that would have gone on the CD but had to be put somewhere else because the CD was so full. Well, my point is that, even though you have to pay for the CDs, you sure get your money's worth.
“My what?”
They do not have a final announcement date set. Hey buddy listen up that’s not anticipation. That’s out of control scrambling. Bad very bad. Rub nose in dodo.
The Examiner then seized upon a statement made by the Applicant in the Appeal Brief:
Many social networks employ some method of dialogue. Facebook has walls and comments. Twitter has @replies so you can follow conversations. Many blogs allow comments on postings. Fred Wilson's Blog has so many regular readers that they have their own microculture. Even Yelp has talk threads. With these methods of communication, we can see a series of social psychology concepts in play. Humans are subject to confirmation bias, which is the tendency to only seek information that conforms to our beliefs. We tend to disregard information that isn't consistent with our own attitudes, and we have a very difficult time being objective. This is a concept we should keep in mind when engaging in social media and doing research or polling people on the Internet. It leads us to search for articles we want to find, and leads us to discount information we just don't want to see.
My ‘20 something existence’ on the planet earth has been everything but a poet. It was the 60 something from within who was in charge.
So what do we think?
According to the police report, the woman had red marks on her neck, arms and back.
We have had overcast sky with hours of rain and drizzle this week. The forecast thunder never made an appearance.
Before we sing, there are just a couple of points that I want to make, and the first is this:
Have a good weekend
Loved me whole
Ulp.
while you take online instruction, you can set your schedule. teacherspayteachers A lot of students find make focus on the mistakes they might make or construct y won’t understand. Once you have got a mini story that focuses on the English grammar structure that you like to learn, you might want to listen to it often times. Being the largest city, Auckland still has plenty taking place , within its radiant city atmosphere. Once you turn out to be comfortable in discussing with friends and indigenous speakers in british, you will find your living within an English speaking country can come as an have factor. This can always be said as on the list of advantages to individuals for learning English who are sensitive to this opportunity. teacherspayteachers Both have become important as they are used as a new basis for licensure, scholarship programs and in some cases used in a few government bodies. Not only would you learn vocabulary and language structures from them, but also you’ll be able to learn the options for thinking exclusive to native English sound system. There are now numerous new methods which they can use to help fight this retention issue, so that you’re better able to keep onto what you could have learned, and use it even while you are not immersed while in the culture that talks that language. then that informs me that you already have all the skills needed to learn English.
Finally had a second Soup Swap on Sunday. The last one was a couple of years ago. I thought there was some demand for a second one, but the turnout was kind of disappointing. HOWEVAH, here is the email I sent to everyone with recipes--thought you might be interested:
It is very possible to dine out successfully without going off plan or feeling deprived, simply use one or more of these tips that were shared in this week's meeting and get your CARD punched next week!
Musical Director: Bill W. Wartes
Now that we are looking to the New Year, I've started thinking a lot about my health and losing weight again now that Baby N is a little older and gives me some time to do anything but feed him.
And here's why she's celebrating!
Todays sees the start of a new challenge at Sugar Creek Hollow, this week the theme is Monochromatic green, the stamp that I have used is a new one that I picked up when I was in France the other week. I found this delightful shop full of scrummy goodies at the next town that we were staying. I think the town was called Lagney sur la Marne, the shop was open on the Sunday and the town was delightful with a local market on at the time. The stamp was made in France so it was a great souvenir. I stamped the image with green and sprinkled some gold embossing powder on part of the cage
With the first rays of light I quietly unlocked the door and went straight to our meeting place near the river. The place was completely transformed from what I thought it was last night. Hundreds of wild flowers covered the entire length and breadth of the river bank. The only thing unchanged was the willow tree. It seemed to me that it had bent more in last few years and the branches now kissed the ripples with the slightest breeze. Mesmerized I watched the beauty around me. It had a strange resemblance to the grave site and here also the flowers seem to watch me with their dewy eyes, telling the story of her unconditional love and complete devotion.
They would put out the motorboat to tow the schooner. You can imagine how far we would get in a day with a small boat towing a big schooner. When we crossed the Strait of Belle Isle, it was so calm the men put the oars out and started rowing. We all looked forward to that wonderful day when we would reach home. Each day brought us a little closer. We never despaired, thinking of the joyful reunion we would have with our families who were anxiously awaiting our return. My boyfriend was also anxiously awaiting. Tears of joy were shed that sixth day of October when we sailed in the harbour. Mom had a beautiful supper prepared for us, with bakeapples for dessert. To meet up with my boyfriend that night was an experience of homecoming one could not forget. Uncle Sam Wicks's wife had a new baby the day we came home. So after spending one day at home, I went over to help my aunt take care of her family for a few days. I was hoping to go to St. John's in the fall, but it looked hopeless for me. Our schooner had been so late getting home, and it would be very late before they had their fish ready to take to St. John's. However, the Silver Jubilee had been home early, and ready to take their fish in. It would be the first trip to St. John's for the Silver Jubilee and a couple of the Matthews women were going and asked me to come along. I gladly accepted and we had a very enjoyable trip. I worried about Dad and the crew of the Polly Bee having to travel so late in the fall. However, God took care of them and they made it back safely. I was married to Walter Matthews at the age of eighteen, in St. Andrew's Church on Silver Fox Island, on June 5, 1936. We didn't have much of this world's goods or a big wedding, or large gifts as people get today. But we loved each other and love covers it all. I remember the day I walked down the church aisle with the man I loved. I felt like the happiest person in the whole world.
And bristeless hair brushes
streams of macroswill. The deadly swill ricochets in wild
I always accepted stances as just being another layer of detail in the forms; I could see where some transitions had stances that rationally coincided with the technique, but most of the time I found the various stances to be pure added detail to a form.
You have to start asking yourself – are there Republicans in high positions that are directing this? Or is it a case of the tail wagging the dog?
04 babe it's up to you ?
Absorbing the bodies of thousands of sewer rats, The monster known as The One becomes even larger and more powerful. He emerges into the open, towering above even Tokyo’s mightiest skyscrapers! Maki transforms into his alien shape and the two do battle, threatening to crush the city to dust under their massive feet.
roll my eyes
Hidden away on a sub level street off of the boulevard Beaumarchais is the latest gastronomic OVNI that has the Parisian food world's panties all in a bunch. Formerly Christian Constant's C'Amelot, perhaps the city's first bistronomique (long before the term became a bobo catchphrase) , the tiny table has been taken over by an interesting chef who dropped off of the face of the culinary scene years back. Jacky Ribault, one of the first to bring the japanesy/French fusion cooking to the French Capital at Shozan (his foie gras sushi and salmon tataki are still on the menu, partly for sentimental reasons), creates a menu with all French produce, hand selected by himself (Annie Bertin veggies, organic meat from the Pas de Calais' Monsieur Boucher) and cooked with a Nippon eye, with a few unusual tastes thrown in from the Land of the Rising Sun. That Ribault worked with Gagnaire, Legendre, Passard and Ladurée-epoque Hermé is pretty evident in the technique, but it's his own poetic generosity that shines through, and the chef promised some interesting things (think market suprise menu) as soon as they are able to maintain cruising speed. The fact that this is the first time he is his own master seemed to please him. His maitre d' (something of a French/Asian fusion himself) worked variously at Rostang, Closerie des Lilas and the Pavillon Montsouris before teaming up with Jacky. The beefsteak with St. Jean de Luz sardine tartar facon béarnaise and the scallops with vanilla'd artichoke (although the apple sorbet seemed out of place) were two standouts. For the moment, thanks to the local foodie blogosphere and press, expect a two to three week wait for dinner and two or three days for lunch. I want to go back and try the rest of the menu.
Now then, if we put our scientific hats on, we can easily see how different animals on earth have taken on specialized bodies that allow them to exist in different environments. Fish live in water, birds live in the air and other animals live on land. This organic pattern also holds true for life in the spiritual world, which the human race has special access to after death. The spiritual bodies we have created during our lives, and which are formed by our souls, have become suited to living in various spiritual environments outside of time and space, according to our ruling love and its derivative passions.
But month after endless month are often spent in rounds of meetings, gathered around charts and descriptions, tinkering away.
Put a tbsp of filling in the one half of the circle and brush milk all over the along the side. Fold one side of the round over the other. Pinch the edges to seal it.
Last week, Britain's attorney general, Lady Scotland, launched a criminal investigation into MI5 complicity in the torture of Binyam Mohamed, a British resident held in Guantánamo.
459. Spicy Basil w/ Chicken @ Penny’s Noodle Shop (Chicago, IL) 8:31 p.m.
You held my hand, taking unsure steps; falling down, you’d pick me up again.
Occur in the Course and Scope of Employment
-freedom-
Here are the milk and cookies they left out for Santa after their play had ended. This is something that Lizzy insists that we do every year, even though we do not, nor have we ever, pretended there was a Santa. We don't even have gifts that are labeled from Santa. Ryan always plays along and eats all or part of them, though all involved parties know it's a game.
The last time I went to the dentist they gave me an estimate of almost 20,000 dollars worth of dental work to get my smile fixed. I cried, then I went home and cried some more. How in the hell will I ever afford that?! I had gotten some teeth fixed, and some pulled and haven’t been back due to lack of insurance. (and money of course)
Using John Boos Cutting Boards To Avoid Food Poisoning
We’re HandyFolk, and between us we should be able to fix/unblock/plant/mend/salvage and clean just about anything. Feel free to have a look around at what we do and who we are. You can contact us using the buttons, and we’ll be in touch to arrange a free estimate.
The third level is where the opinions stop being like assholes, and the people holding them start. This is the level where, fortunately but just as irritatingly, a small percentage insist that you must agree with their opinion, and live your life according to their rules.
But do they almost lose it towards the end?
Close: Wednesday
We were going to see one of the many poor families in the neighborhood whome Mama had adopted. It never occurred to any of us children that we ourselves were poor; "the poor" were people you took baskets to. Mama was always cooking up nourishing broths and porridges for forgotten old men and pale young mothers-- on days, that is, when she herself was strong enough to stand at the stove.
Paper: MME Sunshine, True Black (Papertrey Ink)
‘Dirty’ is true to its namesake, a sensual journey that explores desires and primal instincts and finely balances female and male vocals that weave like serpents in the mix. The album opens quietly with the haunting echoes‘W Train’ and ‘Apres La Plage’, saturating the senses in vivid sound. But it’s not until ‘Voyage’ that we feel the real elusive, unpredictable, and truly underground nature of the album. Frequently returning to quiet interludes and unexpected snapshots of mysterious scenes, ‘Dirty’ is cleverly fashioned for indulging in again and again.
The above bylaw was written and is being recommended for passage by the Central Administration. It is apparent to the Association that the Administration is attempting to put into place measures that will allow the administration and Board to silence both the public’s and the Association’s ability to peacefully and adequately express concerns to the Board. It is also an attempt to prevent the Public and the Association from organizing to attend and speak at a school board meeting.
The photographs has few merits, excepting the fact that it records ….. an odd thing…. in a stunning location …. on a fabulous day.
I'm one big myoma that thinks,
A dung cart fastened to a blank-eyed donkey blocked the narrow London street. Elizabeth reined in and, under her breath, cursed the man driving. He climbed down and she recoiled. Whether it was him or the cart that stank strong enough to turn her stomach, she did not know.
Researchers reviewed medical aid claims data of 32,060 adults who had a heart attack or stroke, backtracked to see if the person had undergone any invasive dental procedures. 650 people had a stroke and 525 had a heart attack after invasive dental work. The researchers considered other factors known to increase risk for heart attack and stroke, such as diabetes and high blood pressure.
In short, I think to be a part of a community is to be brave. Whispering sweet nothing, fantasy dreamscapes in a game of pillow talk with your significant other is a much different thing than being open, transparent, and vulnerable to an audience. There, in that nest of comfort, between those warm sheets of love, we feel safe: guarded against the world and its judgments.
Iván Meade – What would be your dream project?
Ink: Lucky Limeade, Peach Parfait
To that end my first job was to raid the local coffee house – pick your brand of choice – and grab a handful of their delightful wooden stirrers. Once home I laid out enough of them to allow a lipped 40mm base to fit on the top.
Aww, Michelle Williams and Rooney Mara look simply stunning on the red carpet.
On May 1, 1928, Joan Telfer Campbell took her first breath. That same woman would later watch me take my first breath too. My mother died on Christmas Eve in 2009. If she was still with us, she would turn 83 years old today. Honestly, I don’t think about her all that often. That’s for self-protection. When I think of her I hold a mixed bag of emotion: gratitude mixed with guilt. I feel guilt that I didn’t love her as well as I should have, wasn’t there for her as she probably needed me to be. And yet I feel grateful for her influence in my life. To celebrate her birthday, I thought I’d reflect on some of the lessons she taught me—most of them more caught than taught, really, but important things that continue to give direction to the way I live my life.
Wow, y’all are really putting me to work with these questions! I’m actually in the process of creating my own unique HNG superhero costume for Comic Con so it’s funny that you asked this. Princess Trek has been a nickname of mine for about, ohh…15 years….so I’ll go with that as my name in lieu of HNG. I’d LOVE to be able to fly. I dream a lot and at least half the time I have the ability to fly. Super healing would be great too. I’m thinking I’d like a couple of badass Katanas as well. My weakness would be the sun. I have sensitive eyes and the sun gives me headaches so I’d need to have an awesome VISOR as part of my outfit. It’d be cool to work for the government, like GI Joe or SHIELD and defend the US (and World) against supervillians and terrorists.
As already mentioned the gearbox is supplied by McLaren, this is a carbon fibre cased unit and features pullrod operation of the springs and dampers. Last year the springs were mounted vertically and the dampers mounted inside the casing. The only external element was the anti roll bar which sat atop the casing, with drop links down to the low mounted rockers.
If you aren't using homemade chicken broth, look for a low sodium variety. In my experience though, some brands don't have much flavor. You will probably need to experiment with a few to find a brand you like. The fat free half and half helps add creaminess without all the extra calories. However, you can also use skim milk if that's what you have on hand.
A week of mulling over expensive haircuts and penguins. A week of late-night cat tending and bare-knuckle dog fighting. And a week of showing people around the world why western democracy is better than their own hackneyed set-up… The Diary of a Frivolous Monster continues…I’ve really got to get a better catchphrase.
This post though, is for my New England friends whom I love to torture with reports of fantastic weather. It's not perfect here every single day. Only 330 days a year. We're actually having our worst season for weather right now. Spring in NM sucks big time. Or maybe I should say, it blows. April winds bring... allergies? Yesterday we had 40-50 mph sustained winds with gusts in the 70's. Today it has calmed down to 20-30 mph. When it blows from the north it is COLD too. I remember this going on for endless weeks last year. This year hasn't been so bad though, we've had 2-3 day breaks in between of, yes, incredibly gorgeous days. But, this wind is really something. It blows in tons of pollen and keeps it in the air. My kids, who have never had allergies in their lives, got so sick with allergies this spring that I had to take them to the doctor for prescription meds and Grace probably should have stayed home from school a couple of days. Spring in Albuquerque is definitely not our favorite, to say the least.
It’s the lessons you learn on the way there, in between the cracks of the places you thought you’d be going to, that you spend some of your life juice being taught, shown and told.
As she was walking across Willow Bridge, one of the stones she had kicked fell down into the stream. But instead of hearing the ‘plop’ you would expect to hear from a stone landing in water, Lisa heard a ‘clink’. This made her curious so she went to the railings on the bridge and looked down. Below her all she could see was water and the grass on the bank of the stream. Somewhat disappointed, she turned round and, as she was doing so, she saw something flash in the grass. What was that? A coin? A tin can? A piece of broken glass perhaps? No, all those things sound different from that. Lisa decided to go and investigate.
..."but it's mushy peas!", I say. I mean, that statement alone should open up his eyes and result in complete agreement that his gagging episode was purely unjustified. I know he hates anything with a mush to it, but aren't mushy peas an exception to the rule?
The collection on the memo board and magnetic strip is constantly changing, and she loves having control over what she displays. I foresee changing out the magazine art quotes as she grows, and the Suzy Ultman prints can easily be swapped as her taste changes as well. I'll gladly move the DIY nailhead trim art to another part of the house if she tires of it!
It's that I'm selfish and want her here with me. I still need her so badly.
For a main course with this, I baked some potatoes at the same time the beets were roasting. Then I topped the halved, slightly fluffed potatoes with reheated leftover vegetarian chili and shredded cheddar, and microwaved them for a couple of minutes until the cheese was nicely melted. This made a tasty and healthy meal for us last night. You might like to try it too!
Dedication: “To the memory of MY BROTHERS who, not without considerable personal sacrifice, honored for decades that ancient republican faith which is grounded in the sanctity of the family.” (See Items B-4 and B-6, above.)
The Burial Book was lodged in the library where I was working. I began to look at the entries. As a social history it was invaluable, not just for the recording of the passing of my ancestors and how sometimes brief and harsh their lives were, but also revealing the ignorance of the medical profession where regularly people were recorded as having died from ‘Morticia’ which I guess means the cause of death was… death. I studied the gravestones, symbols, designs, codes… and I realised that a graveyard was the perfect place for my dyslexic hero to hide out. Solomon, loves stories and conjures his own from the language of the Memorial Stones. As I began to write and did more research on both my main subjects, the whole thing meshed together - Solomon’s father, the solitary grave, the potential for evil inside everyone, the power of words, the infinite resources of the human mind – the story locked.
HAND MADE COUSCOUS
my eyes and enlighten my heart in your Word, so that I may comprehend fully
When she isn’t chained to her computer, Ginger enjoys spending time with her husband motorcycling through the countryside, visiting Yellowstone National Park, walking her Doberman, reading good books, and talking theory with her friends about the television series Lost. She believes one of her greatest accomplishments would be dusting off her piano and treadmill and using them both—at least once this year.
Muchmore HG, Felton FG, Scott LV. A confirmed hospital epidemic of Asian influenza. J Okla State Med Assoc 1960; 53: 142-145.
156° for 80 minutes.
How is this measured?
Oh, and someone from Brazil reads my blog - I don't know anyone from Brazil, lol!! But it makes me THRILLED that maybe they can get some value & INSPIRATION from what I write! :) Arizona is a pretty COOL place too, never been there! So, it's a place for INTERNATIONAL working and co-operation, working together on things that are IMPORTANT - for this planet & all of us!
And thus as Sophia-Venus descends the staircase, twenty glimmering lines leave their after effects, twenty is also a number of the first possible moves for whomever goes first in chessplay. The Bride Stripped Bare by Her Bachelors, Even, you can see at the end, shows how with the turning of the wheel and the knightly turning propellor, the beginnings of the spacecraft from which she will lauch into space, after sacrificing parts of her dress, as she leaves behind one, she becomes more intimate, she becaimes the bride of the bridegroom whom is one with the father and one with the ‘follower’. Her garments are given to those whom have sacrificed the marriage institution of the church and roamed into fields of free love and wheat, love of naked flesh tinging and emotional satisfaction, aided by the permutations and turnings around of chess thoughts in the craft that flies, the ariel mansion of delights. Sometimes the ideal way is to turn away from a life of naked love flesh tingles in erotic garment of imagination, that of Venus towards that of Sophia, but when the blue heights become too sterile, transcendent and remote, one realises that its her garments that are being let go off so that they can also be placed back on her, to return to her once again to her golden splendour and in new array, her garments are carried off on the spaceship, airplane of love, bearing tidings of white rabbit and Cordoban chess scapes, on the Translove airways of the freedom utopian skies psychedelic skies and they return back to her form again renewed. ‘Cannot a new set be designed, that is, without too radical a departure from the traditional figures…To take her garments even away from her is away from her and to take breaks in airship propellers for a while, flying to the heights, to escape, before returning back to the ground once again in her classical forms, the naked woman ground of freedom and the church of wisdom comes around full circle. She did let them strip her, voluntarily she remained and allowed, even enjoyed, and on one side of the board she stable sat there and span off her garments using her bachelors as her hands, as the chess thoughts spun out and escaped the clasical array, wheeling away and wheeling into return back towards the pastures once again after a flight back and forth as the array is placed back renewed in new classical form. Even reclothing her simultaneously as she was being declothed. There are of course diferent ways of looking in a cubist fashion too so its not some cycle or even linear progression only neither either/or, but is both and inexplicably beyond also. It brings to mind the conjugal and androgynous union discussed before in the painting above and makes us think, from also from beginning:
Another thought came to mind. -- my son is almost 6 years old....I have a son...and he's almost 6.
Abstract: The biological sciences have been transformed by the emergence of Next-Generation Sequencing (NGS) technologies providing cheap and reliable large scale DNA sequencing. These data allow us to address biological research questions that previously were considered intractable, but also raise a number of new statistical and computational challenges. The data contain errors that need careful attention, and the appropriate likelihood functions are usually not computationally accessible, because of the size of the data sets. I will discuss some solutions to these problems and illustrate them in the analyses of several different data sets. In one study we sequenced all protein coding genes of 2000 individuals to identify mutations associated with Type 2 Diabetes. In a second project we used similar sequencing techniques to identify the genetic causes of altitude adaptation in Tibetans. In the third study I will discuss, we sequenced the first Aboriginal Australian genome to elucidate the history and origins of Aboriginal Australians.
If I could do it over: I’d have a contract with royalties
"I have a job. I'm a writer."
The experience saddened me. So few Missourians see the full glory of the state’s terrain and history. Even fewer Americans consider the existence of the middle of the country. Actually, how many of us natives are proud to say we are from Missouri? “Oh yea, you know, Miss-er-i.” We’re happy with our hometowns, but dismiss the entire state. Forgotten.
Keep extending it just a little longer.
about anything but pillage, shouting
AAM: Well, usually I am not in a million places at once—first let me make that very clear as well. But I will give you an example. You have a capacity. You can be sitting, having coffee with somebody and you are present in form, but your mind is a million miles away, and then another part of you is writing an article, and then another part of you is thinking about a family matter. Now, of course you are not bringing the totality of your being to any of those activities.
large dopey fans, or worse, those
* I don't know if it's the same in Florida but, in Arkansas (where my oldest son was born), if a child was born to a couple who wasn't married, the woman couldn't just put his name on the birth certificate. The father has to provide a notarized acknowlegement of paternity. In other words -- since D wasn't there when the birth certificate was filled out, it was his own damn fault!
and here is what I came up with! For my card I've used the Little Things stamp set, which I absolutely LOVE
(2)The report on the monitoring and evaluation of the safety of place of origin, including analyses of the pollution causes, pertinence between the place of origin and the agricultural product pollution, evaluation method and conclusion;
As I stated in the beginning, this is a simple unit, where we will finish with 3 pages reminding us about Anzac Day. This will give Fairy Princess a basic understanding of the Anzac's one we can build upon in the years to come.
Chris: Yeah, I have a vagina… Her name is Jean. ;-)
While I loved Mary as Lori, especially during the epically gruesome showdown in Alex's kitchen, it was her work as Nicole that impressed me the most. Perpetually sheathed in her spider web inspired lingerie, Mary imbues Nicole with a sexual intensity; an intensity that boils over during her Ivy Rosovsky choreographed dance number. Contorting her lithe frame like it were a perverted plaything, Mary heaves and thrusts her way into the deviant hall of fame. Quirky fun-fact: It was during Nicole's erotic dance of mental illness that I discovered that she and Lori shared the same knee type (type-o-titillating).
When I lived in Italy I watched a lot of T.V. My favorite morning news show opened each day with the music of the Verve’s Bittersweet Symphony. I can’t hear that song without thinking of my little kitchen with the T.V. on the counter (on the counter! I loved that- I literally never left the kitchen). Then I would watch L’Occhio lo Spese (If I remember the title correctly, something like: eye on shopping) which was a strange show that, I think, was geared towards housewives, cooking and food in general. I remember one show that discussed broccoli for the entire hour. And it was fascinating – there are a lot of varieties. I also learned to store parsley (prezzemoli: I love saying that word) wrapped in tin foil to preserve it longer (it works). In the afternoon they would show American tv shows (some of which I’d never even heard of), but I began to really appreciate dubbing for the first time in my life. Films that are dubbed into English are generally horrendous, but this was an entirely different level. I became convinced and truly awestruck of the craft when I happened to see an episode of Law and Order that a friend of ours was guest starring in. They had him down. I mean – he was in a little danger of sounding better dubbed…it was surreal to see him speaking perfect Italian (especially as I was straining to follow along). From Kenneth Brannagh’s Hamlet (I enjoyed it much more than I ever did in English) to American soap operas: it was my method of learning the language.
My mother used to call it “petering out”.
as part of health care.
or be naive about once
The Koala Pouch ($14.95 at www.momcepts.com) – A stylish eco-conscious shopping organizer that fits securely over any shopping cart handle to hold EVERYTHING the grocery shopper needs. It has:
They wondered, then asked – and not all that politely either. After showing the two men our rain water collection, recycling and conservation measures, they nodded in agreement that we weren’t doing anything illegal, confirming that the water meter had not been “tampered with” and reluctantly congratulated us on our efforts. Naturally, I related the whole experience to my English as a foreign language learners who soon spread the word. They continue to comment in class on changes that they and their families have made – or not, and what the outcomes have been. Most are realizing some substantial savings which often get funneled into beer and aguardiente consumption. But then that’s another story.
However, it seems the era of the forum is coming to an end. Facebook and Twitter and blogs are how we use the internet now, how we tease our friends and bitch about Hollywood raping our childhood. I’m adapting. I see the value in these things. They are incredible tools that can reach a seemingly unlimited audience, which is something The Halls could never achieve.
The inaugural event will be held at The Armory Sports & Convention Arena (Washington Avenue Armory) next Saturday, May 14. In addition to 15 tasting tickets per admission and a souvenir glass, food tastings will available and several brewers will conduct seminars. Designated drivers will be admitted at no charge.
McMahon hopes it will be the first of many.
It would appear that Griffin's handlers have now told him to wind the party up completely and this is likely to be within the next 3 to 4 months. He will probably take a rump of gullible supporters with him into a civil rights movement free from The Electoral Commission where he will have the money to himself and earn a good living as his reward as indeed are his EU salary and expenses.
Glenfiddich Age of Discovery -- Madeira Cask Finish is a 19 year old single malt whisky. It was matured in new and refill oak casks, then re-racked into casks that were used for maturing Madeira, a sweet fortified wine.
Finally, we believe that cycling is kinder on Planet Earth. At a time when global warming is sounding the death knell of the planet, by cycling you will be giving the kiss of life (and fresh air) to an earth that’s choking on exhaust fumes.
What they are really doing here is getting closure by admitting submission to injustice. The dialogue cannot proceed because they are "begging the question".
Yeah yeah yeah old record but what this means for me continues to
- Increase in size and density of mitochondria. If you don’t remember much from high school biology, mitochondria produce energy which means more of them is a good thing. They also help reduce the build up of lactic acid, which is also a good thing for sports performance.
The shorter amount of time will create a cake with a chocolate “sauce”.
This is entirely the same opinion given in Scorched Earth, Stevens’ novel about a senate race in Mississippi. A conversation between a political consultant, Matt Bonney, and a journalist, Robert Newsome:
Even Barack Obama swerves into the truth once in a while. He did when he declared the issue of gay marriage should be left up to the states. He said this just to try and cover his butt politically, but he is correct. The majority of states have already affirmed that marriage is a union between a man and a woman. As far as I am concerned the majority has spoken.
Ed and I both agree that this isn't a bad story it's just very very dull. We do, however, both like Zoe's new costume, or lack there of. At one point in the story, my flatmate RJ who was also in the room, chimed in with, "Wow, this really backs up all the stories you hear about Doctor Who and people running around quarries in silly clothes."
We're just livin' for today
I had some white miso paste in my fridge. It’s very easy to find in supermarkets these days, and I try to always have some around in case I get a miso soup craving. It is a bit expensive, though if you are like me and enjoy Japanese cooking, it’s very worth it. And you only use a little bit, so it will last for a very long time.
We (OPMA) are very fortunate to have such an experienced and hard working staff at ODA. While we are still a long way from having a product in hand, we wanted to thank Director Boggs, Matt Beal, Mike Eckhart and their staff for tirelessly pursuing this complicated but important issue on behalf of our industry and the citizens of Ohio.
I cried through a contraction on the bed and got the hell out of there and back into the pool, where I continued to have contractions. I won't lie – it wasn't pretty. I asked for people to kill me, and when DH joked “ok,” I punched him. Twice. I begged for an epidural, and I'll be honest, the only thing that kept me from going to get one was the thought of going anywhere to get it. If I had been in a hospital, I TOTALLY would have caved. And regretted it later. Yet another reason I'm glad I had a HB.
That's a very straightforward, yes or no question I think.
This time I received more than cards!
Put broth in measuring cup and add water to equal a total of 1 1/4 cups. Put this back in the same saucepan as you cooked the broccoli in and stir in remaining ingredients - putting the broccoli in last. Using a hand blender, blend all ingredients well - while heating. Stir until desired consistency or heat.
- 6" x 6" scalloped square white card stock- Craftwork Cards
It's really easy to create a lacey paper ruffle border for your layouts. First, cut 1" strips from pattern paper. I used the Martha Stewart doily punch here. After the strip was all punched, I accordion folded the entire strip. This is a really forgiving technique so you don't have to be overly fussy or even. Unfold the paper and adhere your lace paper to the layout. I used hot glue to attach the paper ruffle to the back of my layout.
During the Summer, my dad would meticulously pack up the Buick and we would all pile in and head off to where he was speaking for the week.
This review is probably nitpicky, but I wanted to make the distinction between how materials carry meaning that maybe video images are not yet capable of. Maybe we are in a waystation point in the history of video – maybe the video elegy in the future will become recognizable enough to really impact us, allow us a “gentle space for reflection.” But currently I think it reads more like the aquarium in the doctor’s office, something that takes technology to perhaps overreaching lengths. Or, and I think this more probable, maybe video itself is just a less effective form for elegy than those Hodges’ flowers. Perhaps a video is like the sonnet in poetry, fantastic for certain purposes but not so effective in others. For love, the sonnet is for me – for elegy, however, I choose the villanelle.
Lying to myself,
Once again, multiple passports means more options, and more freedom… in this case, the freedom to travel.
I guess it's bad of me to think this is so funny, but as a parent if you can't find a little humor in even these kinds of moments you'll go crazy!
Impressive, right?! And if these demands aren’t met, according to a lot of the discussions on the group’s page, there will be a protest in Riyadh on Olaya street March 11th. I was also impressed by their code of conduct in which they committed to no sectarianism, no violence or incitement to violence, and no hate speech.
He gets Inori, takes her sword out, saves the day, blah blah blah.
In short, the Qur’an provides all the guidance that humanity needs.
Water spirits, moon maidens, haunted pianos, headless revenants, and an invincible terrapin that lives under the mountains. None of these distract James Holtzclaw from his employer’s mission: to turn the fading gold-rush town of Auraria, GA, into a first-class resort and drown its fortunes below a man-made lake. But when Auraria’s peculiar people and problematic ghosts collide with his own rival ambitions, Holtzclaw must decide what he will save and what will be washed away.
I had a House Party that didn't go as planned so YOU get the rewards, this fun little Philly Cooking Cremes gift package with notepad, magnet, recipe book, coupon to TRY the new Philly Cooking Creme, a HSN coupon, and a special wooden spoon. I will mail a gift set to the first twelve registrants who ask for one!
Ask a friend to help, or do a swap. You clean her living room if she’ll clean your kitchen.
Maybe it is my release?
So the answer to my question would be: yes single people are happier than people who aren’t happy in their current relationship.
Carrie Fundingsland – I am just starting a new project in Hancock Park, a Historical District located here in Los Angeles. It was built in 1914 and architecturally is one of the most stunning homes I’ve ever been in. It’s only on its third owner, so the home is mostly untouched. The new owners are young and hip, but want to keep the integrity of the home. We’re going to use a fresh palette and give it a bit of a modern edge while still staying true to the architecture and details. What’s also fun about this new project, is it is one of my husband’s favorite homes in Los Angeles. We’ve been driving by it for years so he could just ooh and aah. He used to be an architect, so this project is just as exciting for him as it is for me.
AVOID THE TEMPTATION to believe that “The grass is greener on the other side of the fence.” We need to stay focused on where we are now, what we are doing now, our present opportunity, our present job, our present activity. We need to be able to make our present responsibilities work, whatever price we have to pay.
1) I am no longer ‘single’ travelling alone.. I always have my baby with me (except for work)
PSS.. Happy Birthday to my wonderful friend Riley! :)
For faith is to see the unseen
Men killed by Jonah - 0
The camels heard nothing but the silence of the wings speaking to the ancient heart of the wheels of aoxomorim on a vertical time separation
To make the owl:
4) List your websites.
Cardstock: Stampin' Up -Very Vanilla, Sage Shadow
Morello: Hrm. Phreak still hasn’t woken up.
Unsurprisingly, I cannot claim responsibility for this .gif. Like everyone else I’ve been addicted to the tumblrs #whatshouldbmccallme and How Do I Put This Gently.
In 1934, while heading up a New Deal agency over in the Littlefield Building, LBJ met a young woman named Claudia Taylor, whose nickname was “Lady Bird.” He talked her into going on a breakfast date at the Driskill Coffee Shop, and while there, stunned her by proposing marriage.
#3 Like My Memories on Facebook, return to my blog and leave yet another comment on my blog.
Last week, however, Al Qaeda's black flag, complete with Arabic script declaring 'there is no God but Allah' and full moon underneath, was seen fluttering above the Benghazi courthouse building, according to Vice.com.
(Now I really have to see if he brings something else to the table for M:I4 and Avengers. C'mon, dude, you can do eeet!)
***Update: Got the computer on, recovered my file, saved my book onto a zip drive and breathed a huge sigh of relief. Lesson learned.
Much like last year's Spring Trip, we covered a lot of ground in the car. We zoomed up to Paris, then across to Normandy (plus a teeny bit of Brittany) and came back home via the Loire Valley. Despite the weather's best efforts to thwart us, we had a really good time.
The Komodo Dragon is HUGE.. and although they appear to move slow...
This is not to say that those women embrace traditional gender roles. They have cartoonish ideas about traditional gender roles, actually. Many times I have heard it said: “I’m not your typical housewife!!! I read books!!!” as if that is anything new. Bay Area mothers have something to prove. If she’s selling her knits on Etsy, it’s because she’s still an artist. Many remain career-minded overachievers at heart who view their children as projects and always try for extra credit. For instance, when Yelena was born the extra credit was potty training at birth. That particular initiative, although environment-friendly, didn’t square well with Doc Sears theories, though.
I am still saddened by the eventuality of this new building and for anyone who supports the planned new skyscraper I'd like to say this;
For a while I felt a bit stunned and unsure what to do or how to even grieve. I was also keenly aware that my sense of loss had to be a drop in the bucket compared to the two young widows and my uncle who had just lost his wife of many years. I decided – in true homebrewer fashion – that I would dedicate and brew my next batch in their memory, and thus, the Three Halos Rum Porter was born. I brewed it up yesterday, and have an artist friend working up a special label for it incorporating something special for each of them.
2.) What's your dream destination to travel to?
And they did come. With a baseball bat. They found a younger smaller boy in my neighborhood and grabbed him by the collar and threatened him with the bat until he told them where I lived. They rang my doorbell and said they just wanted to talk to me. I –stupidly!– opened the door. They tried to shove their way in but I somehow got the door closed and locked and I bolted up the stairs to call my mother’s office.
Aren't they gorgeous?! I love them! I much prefer this Divergent cover to the hardback!
They’re my babies, but really – they’re still just shoes. One of the things I’ve tried to do (and there have been years where I’ve been more successful at it than others) recently is to be mindful of the space I have for my shoes. Like I said before, I prefer the walk in and see approach, so I can’t do what I’ve done in the past and come home with seven new pairs of shoes and not get rid of some of the ones still in my closet. I have to be mindful. I don’t want you walking into my place and shoes are falling from the ceiling.
I hated math. I don't know that my kids would say they love or hate math. It isn't a "subject." It's just a tool that they use to figure out real things. If they aren't sure, they ask. If no one around is sure, we look it up. No one is going to sit back & withhold information or help in order to test them. It wouldn't be a very nice thing to do and the cookies might suck.
“We can learn to ignore the bullshit in the Bible about gay people – the same way we have learned to ignore the bullshit in the Bible about shellfish, about slavery, about dinner, about farming, about menstruation, about virginity, about masturbation,” Savage told the young students. “We ignore bullshit in the Bible about all sorts of things.”
Sign. Me. Up. lady with the clipboard.
Is it any wonder I continue to wish for more with my EL?
Kinski
This means that I will be ordering the first larger batch of equipment tomorrow and hope that by the end of next week we can have the first people working out at the box. This will most likely not yet be open to everyone, because I want to test out the layout etc. with a few selected people first.
1 – 2 tablespoons sugar
Glapthorn. Tansor, Cotterstock, or Ashton
Zenyatta won 19 of her 20 races, and lost by only a nose her last race, the Breeders’ Cup Classic in November. (Yeah, yeah, some revisionists say it was a head. But watch the race yourself. It was a nose.)
I had no idea how brilliantly it would be executed, though. Russell T Davies wrote a script that will define him and validate his inclusion in the annals of scriptwriting greatness. He provided the perfect vehicle for this dramatic transition.
And God mercifully forgives them for the sins committed – forgives them in such a way that from Him, against whom they have so abominably offended, they will one day obtain, more than do the innocent, quite abundant and quite precious benefits flowing down from Heaven.
Andrew has always loved numbers. He could count to 100 by the time he was 2.
The pianist's Nordic cool is typical of the approach associated with the jazz released by ECM Records. Gustavsen focused on material from his new album The Well. His set sounded more or less like this.
To fix the issue that CSS doesn’t load, I will have to add the CSS/JS folder into IgnoreUrlPrefixes. Foe example, if my CSS and JS folders are “/css_folder” and “/js_folder” respectively, my IgnoreUrlPrefixes will be
(Sooyoung’s POV)
At the risk of becoming monotonous, let us count the ways. First, of course, is that rambunctious version of "Treat Me Rough", which June Allyson invests with an innocent tomboy eroticism (she's like a less obnoxious Betty Hutton) that must have had the Hays Office wondering if this sort of thing was really okay, then shrugging and deciding it was all just good clean fun after all.
A heavily pregnant Guppy!
Generally speaking, internet memes annoy me. But once in a great while I stumble across one that’s actually kinda fun. Today, at Rod Dreher’s blog I came across one such meme. Create two lists for your ideal dinner party. Each list has six guests. The first is made up of dead people, the other of people still alive.
Bertie unhooked his claws from the bird’s back and, not loosening the grip on the windpipe, swung himself over onto the opposite side. His weight and the momentum snapped the bird’s neck and they all fell tumbling onto the nest and over the edge, rolling down the hill in a mass of fur and feathers and blood.
sugar, vanilla and salt. Mix well. Add remaining powdered sugar and half and half. Frost when
The gospel of Jesus Christ is for everyone but it must be believed. So I repeat, “There is good news for everyone but only if you obey the demands of God.”
I hope he's still this excited and interested when the baby does arrive this fall! =)
My favourite details are the use of the gold animals on each place and on the escort card table and the inspirational quotes dotted around. It really personalises the celebration and of course I adore the flowers - those yellow billy buttons really pop with the orange roses!
I am going to finish my flavored yogurt and bran (with flax added of course) and then a cup of unsweetened tea and then………the treadmill. 45 minutes of sheer fun for Sunday morning before most people are even up. The sun is shining so bright and that makes a huge difference. Makes you want to smile and it just means summer is coming. Outdoors and no coats and freezing temperatures. Yippee. Ok, here is to less carbs week 3. Experimentation is always fun. :) Feel free to join me in eating clean and getting rid of sugar, processed foods and white flour. Anyone want to try with me. You know you want to.
After the weekend adjournment, Mr Sheridan asked whether in light of the publicity pertaining to News of the World phone tapping activities Mr Bird would like to change his evidence regarding use of private investigators in the case. Mr Bird declined to do so.
Some of my other travel photos from Peru, including Machu Picchu and other sacred Inca sites, can be seen in other posts in this blog and also in a gallery HERE.
Creator Holly Sorensen confirmed the news on her Twitter account by saying “MIOBI nation. We all love you so much. And we are, very sadly, three weeks away from the series finale of #miobi.”
I am the youngest of 3 girls. We would all three be in the back seat with our one thing that we were allowed to bring along to entertain ourselves.
1 tsp of lemon juice
Well thats it for me today! Thanks for stopping by and for all the lovely comments!
Ribbon, Bow, Swing Cushion and Underdress: R89, R59, RV29
i started thinking that this time next year, we will have our own backyard – where we can host a birthday dinner and sit in the sun, kick back with a few drinks. In our home. how exciting is that???
Overall, it’s clear that the lack of queer characters across the big three networks is not an oversight but a purposeful tactic of the large corporations who are trying to sell themselves to an imagined audience. But with so few queer characters and such little information from the networks themselves it’s hard to say exactly what is to blame. It seems as if television will progress toward more equality of diversity but when queers are limited to being targeted as “sexy,” and therefore defined by their sexuality, it is hard to say when a more normative view will arise. Shows like Glee, and ABC’s Modern Family, are taking strides by hitting the issue on the head. Hopefully in time such blatancy won’t be necessary or expected. Until then, this is a broad issue with no one clear solution, and an intersectional approach considering targeted audience differences and not forgetting about other forms of exclusion is a good start because as Americans, we are all the audience. And if we don’t make statements about what we want from the networks, and critically consider the possibility of our own prejudices, be it across sex, race, or other social divides, we will be giving in to the opposite force of power instead of using what Michel Foucault would say is our rightful force to push back and demand equality (Foucault). Television is not a hierarchical institution, but one that tries to feed us what we want. So we need to know what we want first.
I keep trekking up to H&M after work, only to become immediately overwhelmed and to make impulsive, ill-fitting purchases.
While Likourezos acknowledged that only “sharp cuts in staff and programs” had led to a balanced budget, “Polytechnic is rich both in physical assets (with few liabilities appurtenant to those assets) and intellectual assets…. These assets should not be given away in a transaction that offers no firm and binding commtment for value received, and which risks the extinction of Polytechnic’s rich 153 year legacy.”
2 1/2 t baking powder
Blessed are the chosen! Blessed the guest at home in your place! We expect our fill of good things in your house, your heavenly manse. All your salvation wonders are on display in your trophy room. Earth-Tamer, Ocean-Pourer, Mountain-Maker, Hill-Dresser, Muzzler of sea storm and wave crash, of mobs in noisy riot— Far and wide they’ll come to a stop, they’ll stare in awe, in wonder. Dawn and dusk take turns calling, “Come and worship.”
My poetry blog now has a brand new layout! I also decided to change my criteria for what I post on it. This message is now on the side of my poetry blog:
So I got in a good 30 min warm-up, which ended when I took off my shoes and ran through sprinklers at the NC Capitol Building. Unfortunately, I forgot that sprinklers move, and left me shoes directly in the spray zone. Subsequently, I went to the porta-potty. A good way to horrify people is to walk out of an overused porta-potty with squishy shoes.
1/2c. melted butter
He cooked the horse beef and I ate some, objectively agreeing it was good, but my mind screamed nooooo! And I felt sick and why am I like this? I´m killing Earth! Yes, you can blame me! Rational people will eat rats and cockroaches.
His friend the bus driver was very angry indeed at seeing how narrow the tunnel was and had a lot of reversing but as my stepfather said, I was asleep!
Throw Tekwan into it. Cook briefly.
As highly recommended, we chose to visit the village of Tortuguero near Tortuguero National Park on the Caribbean coast. Our place of stay was an all-inclusive resort, Laguna Lodge, near the village. This area on the Caribbean side is only reachable by boat or plane and transportation was included in the lodge’s nightly rate. We were extremely thankful for this as finding our own way would have been a nightmare. One downside however, seeing as it is an all-inclusive resort, was how touristy it was and as Jerry describe it, “we felt a little like cattle.”
In each of the ten chapters, Litfin covers the life and influence of a church father. It is difficult to coalesce the themes of the fathers (which rightly includes one woman, Perpetua), for each had many different themes associated with their lives and eras. Nevertheless, Litfin masterfully communicates his main idea: church fathers matter because they are people whom God used at a critical time in history to defend and continue the spread of the gospel. This means that present-day evangelicals are part of something much greater than their own relationship with God (p. 264).
As a continuation of yesterday’s cold calling post, we are looking to answer the following questions: What is the best time of day and/or the best day of the week to cold call? How many hours per day should I spend cold calling?
Buttar answered that there was something new about this issue — Takoma Park would be joining conservative-leaning communities that have spoken out against the NDAA such as El Paso County, CO, home to five military bases including the Air Force Academy. Indeed, “quite frankly, progressives and liberals have been very slow to adopt this struggle at the elected layer,” even though at the grassroots level, Occupy camps around the country were quick to oppose the NDAA as well.
I've redone this post according to the new size so that it could have the original format. The pictures have to be huge.
Share Them.
Besides the Gloriana recording, I have also downloaded the Walton recording which includes Façade. It is also commendable, despite some minor slips in the instrumental playing. Cross and Pears are deadpan in the recitations of Edith Sitwell’s surreal poems.
My husband had slowly been hacking away at these vines that week and I hadn’t even noticed. So imagine my surprise when the weather turned warm that Saturday and I found a barbecue grill in the yard.
And pluck till time and times are done
David Wilson has had a very solid Junior season in Blacksburg with 1627 yds. on 266 carries with 9 td’s (10 overall). Although he has yet to declare for the 2012 NFL Draft like other ACC standout RB Lamar Miller already has, Wilson will have a very tough decision to make considering his increasing draft stock. In past games I have watched of Wilson he has displayed an excellent blend of balance, speed, and burst. His ability to finish runs and continue to make yards after contact make him a very special weapon as well. In this game Wilson showed the same type of burst and top-end speed that makes him a threat to take it the distance every time he touches the ball. However, he still struggles to try and bounce things outside far too often and really believes in his speed too much at times. Playing against a defense like North Carolina really put this issue on full display as Wilson tried to force things outside against a defense that was just too fast and too disciplined to allow Wilson any running room inside or out throughout the game. This to me is the biggest difference to me between Wilson and Miller as Miller consistently takes what the defense gives him and gets up field in a hurry. I would like to see Wilson attack the line of scrimmage with more authority instead of bouncing it outside, trying to create something that isn’t there. It should also be noted that Wilson had done much of his damage against inferior competition in playing early season games against teams like Appalachian State, East Carolina, and Marshall. In this game he faced a legitimate defense with speed and talent and struggled to make an impact, which could be a concern depending on your vantage point. Wilson also showed a lack of blitz pick-up by more or less letting LB Zach Brown get to the QB, resulting in an errant and dangerous throw. I need to see him be much more physical and take on defenders to protect his QB before writing him off as a complete player and potential first round prospect. Wilson also had some ball-security issues in this game, coughing it up twice although one was not called a fumble and the other was luckily recovered by Virginia Tech. The skill is there for Wilson, but is obvious he is not yet there as a prospect as he is not as talented as former Virgina Tech RB Ryan Williams who went on to become a 2nd round pick last year.
It’s been four days since my last run.
It’s happened again. Some publisher has decided that the best way to promote a game about guns is to have a woman show off her boobs whilst holding some said guns.
I tried, unsuccessfully, to take a picture that shows the purple fringe around my green arm. Allie wondered why I was taking a picture of anything other than her.
Aha! "A prize." Some generic trinket. If I'm not expected to give her cash, then hell, I'll just pick up a bunch of cheap crappy toys and be done with it. I'm super lucky.....
Czech President Vaclav Klaus on Saturday criticized U.N. calls for increased "global governance" of the world's economy, saying the world body should leave that role to national governments.
EDIT: many of you have been asking so here is where you can get the REMOVE Cleaner. Go to Helmar's Blog at the end of this blog hop and look down the left hand side. Main retailers are there and all of our online ones also. Happy Helmar Holidays everyone!
Most of these alternative sources of revenue are sanctioned by central government, but in some instances the "dash for cash" has led councils into activities which are outside the law.
The Idiot was standing in the middle of his own bedroom floor with a rolled up school photo of his youngest son, given the impossible task of tracking and murdering an unknown foe that had maliciously bitten his little bride on the chest.
As ActionAid’s Hunger Busting Blogger, you will give poverty a voice by:
surgery of the uterus
What's he eating?
ginger garlic paste 1 tsp
The obstetricians' College Statement sets out advice on TOL (trial of labour), including:
First, I want to be absolutely clear: I agree that if we assume that something is going to go wrong, then that will cloud our perception of events and the going wrong will be all that we notice, no matter what else is happening. I agree that perception, in one sense, creates reality insomuch as it dictates what we see in our reality. Two people watching a sunrise on a beach will, given exactly the same materials, will paint two completely different pictures of that sunrise. This does not change the sunrise itself.
Back to the show. Barbara and I found ourselves convulsing in laughter in another booth. In fact, the guy running the booth told us we needed to buy something since we were getting so much entertainment out of looking. He was right. We bought many stamps there, too, both image and sentiment. They are Rubbernecker stamps, which I had never heard of before. But I will look for them again at the new shows, because they are too danged funny. Hopefully, I will find a need to make many, many humorous cards!
The Roman Road ruin in the picture above was part of the eastern branch of the Via Maris through Galilee.
Reliable is not a word that I would use describe my recent cell phone service. I have been with the same large, well-known company for almost 10 years and have always had great realiable service and friendly customer support. Not so much lately. For the last month or so I have had sketchy service. I have more and more "lost" calls, calls that never come through but show as "missed" and voicemails that show up a day or so after I receive them. Not gonna work for me. Here's the kicker - after finally getting fed up enough with the service I try to call customer support. I spend TEN minutes trying to get through their automated system. TEN minutes just to get to a live person. I would hit a menu option and it would repeat the menu. Apparently, due to my poor reception it could not "hear" the option I chose. When I finally got a live person I hear, "I'm sorry, Ma'am. I cannot hear you. (Mind you, I don't think I had spoken a word to him yet). We are having technical issues and you will need to call back."
So the question that must be answered is…..
“Hey,” he says.
Even as late as mid-June, Obama's Interior Secretary stated that it was his hope that the moratorium prohibiting offshore drilling would lass less than six months! Obama continued to defend BP even in the face of scandals involving the Minerals Management Service, the department of the federal government responsible for regulating offshore drilling and other industrial activity of the oil industry in the U.S. While issuing 'safety alerts' to BP and other oil companies to activate back-up switches on oil rigs (an option of last resort to prevent crude oil blowouts), the MMS did nothing to enforce its regulations. The director of MMS stepped down after the spill when it was revealed that MMS staff had accepted 'gifts' from oil companies, such as tickets to sports events, lunches, and even sex parties with industry-hired prostitutes.
I have in my heart the morning we said good-bye to you as God took you home to be with him.
3) Add this to the cooled flour/water mixture, stir, then knead for several minutes by hand to form a soft dough. The dough should form a ball, but will remain somewhat sticky. Add additional flour only if necessary and keep your hands and work surface lightly oiled to prevent sticking.
Sometimes I wonder if the USAAF, when faced with hundreds of thousands of wannabe-pilots, didn't deem many unsuspecting men "uncoordinated." And sent them on to other, less glamorous, still necessary tasks.
Many western countries when they are satisfied with the mathematical accuracy of the Indian astrology calculation in planetary mechanics are doing research in the behavioral aspects of the predictability. Unfortunately with heavy leanings towards western education we are importing retrograde toxic and opiate western religious values as -Carl Marx pointed out- in the name of modernization. One such thing was commenting that astrology was not a science a dogmatic Christian thought because the existence of astrology disproves only one life theory and final judgment assumption of Judeo Christian belief. The amount of money and human resources spent on finding the behavioral aspects of Astrology (both western and eastern) in any western country is staggering despite opposition from religious groups. Many Europeans and Americans still do such annual forecasts by seeing the ground hog shadow during March.
Before you relocated to Los Angeles, did you do any work in Chicago or Kankakee area?
-Add the honey and stir everything together.
Dedicating a room to the plants where, enclosed, the lighting would keep everything warm, seemed the best route. On an economic level, according to hydroponics-simplified.com, the water used to grow hydroponic produce is less than a traditional garden because it recirculates. So the only real issue cost-wise is the electricity for lights.
* 1 cup shredded cheddar cheese
Since the dawning of the new millennium, two events have occurred that are changing everything. The first is the movement of the Earth’s Kundalini, which happens every thirteen thousand years and is tied to the precession of the equinoxes. The Kundalini is related to the Earth’s spiritual growth process. Every time it moves, it has a new vibration, which in turn takes us to a new level of consciousness.
So I quickly go in, and order myself a Nutella Crepe. I check out their drink menu. Today is the rare day when I am in the mood to drink something that is not Coffee. Hmm. I’ve never tasted an Avocado Bubble Tea Shake before. Pearls too? Yes please!
Also beaten was Mario & Luigi: Bowser's Inside Story. Not a bad game, just hated the mini games that would get you ultimate armor. Normally, I'm a perfectionist about these things, but I just don't have the patience to deal with slips of the finger = start over from the beginning. I do wish the teaming up with Bowser idea was more announced, sort of like how Bowser joins Mario in Super Mario RPG.
I'm thinking of moths now because I'm thinking of people, how they flicker close to the flight and swell with its warmth, how they charm and seduce and suddenly they are gone.
2 boxes of devil's food cake
was visiting from Arizona, so we visited with her and
During his brief life Jim Morrison was once quoted as saying, "If my poetry aims to achieve anything, it's to deliver people from the limited ways in which they see and feel."
she jumps forward, arms awry
It is much easier for me to accept difficult things when I don't start thinking, "What did I do wrong to deserve this?" and instead think, "This is temporary. With God's help, I will learn from this and become stronger."
WOMAN’S PERFUME
4. Best New Christian Writer
Bottoms Up, You Subtle Wonders You.
Adding to the novelistic narrative of this story is the fact that the average Chinese citizen probably knows virtually nothing about this. As reported by Poynter, the Chinese government has used sophisticated censorship technology to blackout news stories about Chen in the last several weeks. Indeed, the silencing only ended with a brief state media report today saying Chen had left the embassy of his own volition.
America is a nation of mixed heritages, and nothing reflects that better than our holidays. Indeed, each one reflects a particular immigrant groups impact on our country. And, it should be noted, that these groups were not readily accepted in mainstream America. Each were discriminated against. Each were villianized by certain groups to be a threat against our ideals and principles. Such rubbish.
Unlisted: Another Founders Gravity Head Ale
but life isn't what it used to be and plowing ahead is not an option when i'm trying to grow 2 healthy babes in my tummy.
Runs. Giggles. Holds hands.
If you like flowers and want to encourage pollinators, this lovely package of seeds will be a delight. In one packet of seeds there are 20 different varieties, either annual or perennial, and each was selected to be hardy in this area (Zone 3). One 10g packet will cover an area of 80 sq.ft. and costs only $7.95.
Who doesn't love and even need a few good Christmas stories to warm their heart and remind us how small and simple acts of Christmas magic can renew souls and change lives? This is one of my favorites. Enjoy!
Writer- None
It seems like she has a good group of guys, some very handsome fellas. They already want us to really like Doug, so of course I picked Doug for her as of now. He has that Brad look to him and we know she dug him for a minute.
0940: Board bus from Tobu Nikko Station to Ryuzu waterfall (the furthest stop)
Hey everyone! Man has life been kicking me in the butt lately! Whew! Seems like there is ALWAYS something coming up that I hadn't planned on. Can someone say vacation? =) Anyhow, I'm bringing you a card I made for the Meljen's Design challenge this week!
The wise man’s eyes are in his head; but the fool walketh in darkness: and I myself perceived also that one event happeneth to them all.
The ever intrepid Nathan Bransford has come up with an intriguing experiment: shuffle a slushpile in an agent's shoes. He has randomly chosen five queries from the 150+ submitted by willing participants, and we, his minions, were instructed to pick one that we (in our slinky agent's footwear) would choose for a submission request. In truth, he has posted the first thirty pages of all five submissions so that we can see how well the queries match the writing.
05. Black Mountain (Roger Pavlica, Rick Steele) - 3:39
Lead Thou me on!
1) He, like Ryan, fails to appreciate the awesomeness of corduroy. He chose to celebrate last year’s Corduroy Day wearing ….. plaid twill shorts. Not cool. He said it “counted” because plaid is made up of lines, too – but Jonathan – plaid consists of perpendicular lines, whereas corduroy (and the Corduroy Day date, 11/11/11) are both made of parallel lines. Changing the Corduroy Day date to be written 11-11-11 does NOT COUNT. Furthermore, twill is not the same as corduroy, no matter what the print is.
BUT probably the most fascinating was Hill Close Gardens. These are 16 individual gardens, cultivated in Victorian times by Warwick shopkeepers and tradesmen who had no gardens of their own. For long years, the gardens were left derelict but at the turn of this century, locals banded together and 4 yrs ago, the renovation of Hill Close Gardens was complete. Some have their original summerhouses, some of these buildings now " listed". They're secluded peaceful places for hardworking townsfolk.... to relax after digging their own special earth..
Formatting: Let's see, how can I say this delicately? How about crap-tastic? I uploaded a partial of my manuscript and it only split the first four chapters. It also would not allow me to use tabs, or double spacing, or pretty much anything else it was supposed to.
The good people come back at dawn to clean up after the bitches. And the political response has a matte gray aura surrounds it. Meaning the fear possesses those in office, they cry out for help when shit happens, the media picks up on the crisis and captures what once again becomes a circus on broadway and 14th by the tribune tower there in oakland rising high. And don’t think for a second that joining a circus is all kicks and giggles, nah, you got real tigers and lions and elephants could crush ten men in a sudden fit of stampeding rage. And have. To protest their captivity. Their condition. Well, see the parallel? We got people, humans, sentients, who find themselves truly in captivity, forced to go through certain repetitive motions to simply exist in a tolerable fashion in the cities of our dear country! hey now, this is not wonderful. Not at all.
passing, gods pronouncing
The Pagan Roman Emperor Diocletian ordered the persecution of Christians, something that George refused to obey, he protested to the Emperor to no avail. The Emperor ordered the torture of George to break him of his faith. George faced terrible tortures but never gave in. He was beheaded for who he was and what he believed in on the 23rd April 303 AD
Score: 88%
‘Yeah I noticed that. Mine came with a small note saying that my glasses made me look a dork.’ I readjusted my glasses on my nose. ‘I like my glasses.’
Mark Lindsay-singer, songwriter.
But I know he did. He just doesn’t believe what he heard. Dad once said people’s brains are hard of hearing” (Puck, 46, 1st ed.)
Those two don't make good companions - well perhaps it would be more accurate to say the two opposing realities don't sit easily with me.
But for a time we were blinkered, a rather short time which ended around three years ago, but still a good couple of years in to my tenure in management. Somehow we lost a bit of experimentation and broadmindedness that we began with. We turned our noses up at the very mention of cocktails for a time and people may have been occasionally rebuffed if they asked for something that wasn't 'purest beer' or indeed purist beer.
The corners are black card stock-cut 2 square 1-3/4" x 1-3/4" then cut diagonally to make the triangles
The topic for this week is your favorite childhood memory.
Description of Autumn
We think that when a guy says he’s going to leave his girlfriend/wife for us, we believe them. We think he’ll ‘come to his senses’ and ‘realize what he’s missing’ and naturally come back to us and love us like we’re supposed to be loved.
But with that behind me, I now turn my attention to the coming faire season. Last weekend I attended a meeting with a few St. George principals and the entertainment heads of Renaissance Productions, for whom we perform at several events. We worked out ideas for some overall themes for the shows, and how better to communicate those to the entire cast. We also discussed ways to help educate our fellow performance troupes in the art of interactive theatre, and how to encourage them to participate more fully in creating the immersive historical environment.
At the end of this post, there are several links giving more indepth information on the various types of rail passes. I will focus more on what you see at the train stations and inside the trains.
● Will I lose ownership or control of my home?
The next day at school, Darren has Madam Octa in his locker and Steve sees him talking to her. Darren reveals he overheard the conversation between Steve and Crepsley. As Steve tries to take a look at Madam Octa, she escapes and bites him. Darren goes to Crepsley to ask for the antidote. Crepsley agrees to under the condition that Darren become his assistant as a half vampire. Darren agrees reluctantly and Crepsley bloods him. They go to the hospital where Crepsley administers the antidote. Darren then sounds the alarm forcing Crepsley to leave without him. However the vampire part of Darren soon begins to be too much for him to handle. After Darren nearly feeds on his sister he agrees to leave with Crepsley. He fakes his own death and a funeral is held for him. During the wake Steve notices the scars on his fingertips from when Crepsley converted him into one of his own kind.
Since JT is currently ‘non-verbal’, we communicate by various other means. Primarily, we use PECS: the Picture Exchange Communication System: a type of ‘augmentative communication (PECS) It’s a straightforward way for JT to tell us what he wants and how he feels, using picture cards. Here is a helpful overview of the system: http://polyxo.com/visualsupport/pecs.html
At the hearing he commented,
Article by Zach Sharf
but the guilt cannot be sealed,
Set in the early 1960s, "Sparrow's Flight" brings together two people from opposite streams of life. It presents the world from their point of view rather than the historical side. Will's patriotic duty vies with his longing to do right by the woman who has literally landed on his farm and crept into his heart. Natalya is enthralled by the clothes, food and way of life in America and has difficulty aligning what she sees with the Russian version of life in the USA. Will is kind and protective, unlike any man she's ever met in her homeland.
For me the pleasure of skiing is in its freedoms. It is the one area of my life where I can truly mix elemental living with excitement and physical pleasure. Gardening does that – in a more gentle way of course - in my daily life, but skiing is the ultimate escape into the majesty of the natural world. The birds of prey riding the thermals around the snowy peaks, the glimpse of chamois clinging to rocks, the tracks of unknown creatures across otherwise virgin wastes, the squeak of fresh snow, the smoothness of the ski gliding through it, the puffs of white crystals catching the sun’s rays, the elemental loneliness of skiing in a white-out, the knowledge that friendly mountains can just as quickly become foes, the feeling that you are truly alive. You are dancing with life.
For in my weakness
I wish the chairs weren't in Devon - 320 miles seems a long way to travel in one day, but I'm convinced that I can make a decent mark-up if I ensure that the chairs are well-photographed and the auction ends on a weekend evening (when many potential buyers will have had a few drinks).
Cooking/Recipes - Obviously, this binder holds our recipes. It's an ongoing project. I also use it to store cooking reference materials. Our grocery store (Wegman's) is wonderful for giving out free cooking guides and recipes. We use these resources a lot!
Would you like to increase your strength and join the Avengers as they fight all that is evil in this wretched world? (Anyone else excited to see this?) Congratulations, eat the same way, just more of it. We can get all nerdy with calorie intake and macronutrient ratios, but why not keep it simple until you have to? Keep your protein intake up, consume more fats in the form of coconut oil/milk, olive oil, and nuts, make sure you have a large sum of starchier carbohydrates both pre- and post- workout and you are set. Every 2 weeks increase your food intake by 300 calories or so if your numbers aren’t going up.
Sept 2010’:
Food Colouring
"The only growth that has any significance in God's plans is the growth of believers." (pg. 38)
It is illogical for Bloom to categorically dismiss the idea of “interpretation,” to argue that every interpretive activity is unavoidably and necessarily a misinterpretation. However, if we ignore this idiosyncratic and grandiloquent use of terminology, Bloom essentially suggests that every poem is both dependent upon yet different/more than those poems that precede and influence it. Old Testament theology is a variation of the activity of inner-biblical interpretation, just as “all criticism is prose poetry.” The way in which the Chronicler responds to certain concerns unique to their situation is both dependent upon yet different/more than the concerns that occupied those who wrote the books of Kings.
Shades: Ray Ban
On Friday, May 18, 2012, Restoring Rutland will host a silent auction and benefit concert to benefit families of Tropical Storm Irene, starting at 7:30 p.m. at Center Street Alley Bar in downtown Rutland.
Of Time's ravenous maw
"Spoonful"
Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps And More, a division of I Did It Creations, was created and is owned by Robyn Weinrib. Robyn offers a wonderful variety of digital stamps and digital papers,designed to meet the needs of all digital paper crafting addicts for every occasion.
November-Enter open at DTCCU trial if needed, work scent articles, track if weather is nice
Thursday:Band, 2:45-5:45
I have tickets to Live with Regis and Kelly show in Las Vegas!!
Should I do a pseudo travelogue made up of a pastiche of my emails and diary etc?
Some nights we would wander if in search of adventure, usually ending up at our favorite Korean karaoke place, the Kenny Rogers Music House. A minivan-sized photo of Kenny Rogers enticed customers into the establishment, which on the inside was decorated like a mall's "Santa's workshop" display, except with a good dozen Pokemon statues. This was Korea, and it was awesome.
Email me at ThatGirlAni(at)gmail(dot)com to let me know if you would prefer the Amazon or iTunes gift card.
SCHOENBAUM SC. Economic impact of influenza: The individual’s perspective. Am J Med 1987; 22 of 82 (Suppl. 6A): 26-30.
Ashley: Stress relief, coping with stress.
It's time to give you the full lowdown on this beer brewed back in October as it's time for the aged version to emerge from their catnap in two Scotch Whisky barrels where they have been purring away for six months. One a Caol Ila & the other a Clynelish barrel. Tomorrow they are being packaged for bottling & keg for our launch of the aged versions at our ambitious MTB at Cask on May 5th.
Žižek gave the example of Bill Clinton's question to the Occupy protesters to make suggested reforms as an attempt from the system to save itself. He said it is a clear example of the "if you can't beat your enemy, praise him" logic.
Krevor-Weisbaum said Riley’s legal team would comment further after they had seen the indictment.
Predominantly, each of the student groups that came through said they opposed all the things that I just said- oil exploration, expansion… and they were concerned, in a very idealistic way, about our environment, which I greatly appreciated, but the question I ask you, is when you come to us asking for more dollars for the university and the system itself is creating- those that are engaged in the system may be creating an inability for us to provide those resources to you- what can I do to help clarify inside of that population that if you want more money, you can either choose- because I asked them if they wanted to tax themselves, too, and that wasn’t a good solution either.
While not “on the menu” per se, I asked the owner if he had any Tadikh, the crusty layer that forms at the bottom of the rice pot. He was happy to oblige, and offered to top it with Ghormeh Sabzi, a sauteed mix of dill, parsley, cilantro, leek and scallion, cooked with kidney beans, whole dried lemon and lamb that has been simmered for many hours. This is clearly a homestyle dish, but I’d grant it fit for the Shah of Iran.
I latched on to the term dataporn when a colleague jokingly used it recently, but it seems to be a term already out there in the wild, with occasionally good commentary. This blog post echoes my concern: that the allure of dataporn may be an unintentional stumbling block on the road to operationalizing semantic searching.
- Yeh, baby, but you get the morning-after pill the marra?
US gold gained half a percent to $1740.30. “Once the higher CPI (consumer price index) came out, inflation worries prompted traditional buyers to come in quickly,” said a US-based trader. China’s annual inflation rate accelerated to 4.5 percent in …
Cassel Aaron
These chemicals would begin to enter the South African population either through drinking water or through produce irrigated with contaminated water.
These words are on my heart for today and I want you to take heart that you are special indeed!
Well I’m taking the kids to Tin Can Bay to hand feed the dolphins there at http://www.barnaclesdolphins.com.au/. Now before I get a huge amount of hate mail from animal protectionists, the feeding is strictly controlled, and apparently only a very limited amount of fish is given, and only once per day.
Much of that work has been denigrated by Obama as unproductive and contrary to American principles.’
your eyes are telling me
The story of Daniel Johnston, who is known to most as the guy behind that curious “Hi, how are you” T-shirt featuring a weird frog creature worn by Kurt Cobain, is at once tragic and uplifting. Although he has suffered from severe manic depression with psychotic delusions all his life, Daniel has achieved notoriety and acclaim for his art, having released close to 40 albums, sold countless works of art, worked professionally with the likes of Jad Fair and Maureen Tucker, had his songs covered by Sonic Youth, Beck, Yo La Tengo, Pearl Jam, and Wilco (among others), and even landed an appearance on MTV. His story is a stranger-than-fiction tale that one would chalk up to mere legend (Joining a traveling carnival? Crashing an airplane? Drawing hundreds of Jesus fish inside the Statue of Liberty?) had the events not all been verified and accounted for.
We got to stay at the Doubletree in Del Mar. We have stayed there before for another trip and found the hotel to be nice, comfortable and affordable. I forgot to mention that they are dog friendly!!! Jack has stayed in hotels before and he is well behaved. My black lab, Hunter on the other hand would have been a terror so he stayed home with my boyfriend.
Back in the 70s, your goal (mainly women) was to get as brown as your skin would permit. Sun BLOCK or sun screen was basically nonexistant. You wanted to amplify your rays - SPF numbers hovered around 2, 4 and 8. Women typically lathered on Crisco and baby oil to get that deep baked look.
The goal is to KNOW that you are being interviewed, but remembering that the interview does not start with the initial verbal conversation, it starts with the non-verbal first.
lives? We looked at each other, both of us hooked on a crazy idea that we
I've told the story, with very little alteration, in Last Train from Kummersdorf. He was accused of being a 'Leftist' - which he was - and saved because my grandmother went to 'a very important person' to plead for him But I shan't write at length about that today. In 1938, my grandfather was moved to Graz, in Austria, at the Anschluss, and never returned to work in Silesia, though there were many family visits.
and you felt the old tug
P.S: the paper is an OOOOOLLLLDDDD one from MME, so many friends asked about this paper that i had to let you all know before you have a need to ask, lol
Qutab and Farid have come in the wedding procession,
6) Head into Agotrop cave and take the exit out of the cave to reach a small island with a tree (I might have a map of Agotrop cave in the maps section, I might not) Go inside the tree and have fun navigating this maze. I will NOT map this one, but if any kind souls wish to make direction or maps to this, feel free. It's a bit of a mapping nightmare. Best recommendation I have for you is once you leave the first tree and are walking on limbs, take the first north and right limb. After that, you are on your own.
I cram a ton of stuff into my weekends... Makes me tired to even think about them.
The author’s background as a crime reporter gives him the leverage to churn out such a fantastic piece of crime-thriller. With such in depth research and insight, the book feels more real than just “a piece of fiction”.
of a particular language, or lack of (willing) users of it around us, all of them having the lack bit in common: lack of use. I mean “use” in the sense of meaningful use. Talking about a single vs. several brown cows in order to introduce the grammatical concepts of singular vs. plural, for example, or about the same ruminants jumping over the moon in order to introduce prepositions is
The Obstetricians felt all politicians labour under a misconception.
Please click the link below to view the PDF... and as always, I'd love to here what you think!
Police then detained protesters who had remained peacefully on the square. Two of the opposition leaders were dragged away while addressing the crowd and the third before he could take the stage.
After 2 hourse, place 1 or 2 layers of tin foil on top of the meat and let the edges curl upward to make a basket.
As ever with budget tablets, there are some corners being cut. That’s no different with the Acer Iconia Tab A200, and the eagle-eyed among you will have noted the lack of a rear-facing camera lens in our pictures.
Dr. Gregory Stanton of Genocide Watch already started warning in 2002 that “the South African farmers are the single group of people most targeted by mindless murders in the entire world.”
There I can feel
conglomerate media company. I knew it would hit the newsroom, but I always
Interior remodeling, carpet, paint, ceilings, etc ($30,000.00) (Misc Vendors)
There is a sandbank to maroon people on, separated from the island by shark infested waters. There is a forest, undergrowth, a shallow beach and a deep harbour. I added high cliffs with a tall tree, old ruins and of course an active volcano. Since this is a pirate treasure map there is a rhyme, giving a clue to where the treasure is hidden, but in the way of all stories, only part of the clue is there, the rest was burnt away. Maybe this was in a fight over the map?
Let mercy fall on me.
* Colouring medium - Promarkers
For all the frustration not being able to sleep brings, it's also an opportunity to use time that no one else gets to use...
Then I was a wife who's husband was lied about. My two little ones a baby and hubby all needed a strong person to rely on. I needed a moment to scream in my pillow.
Some of the excuses her parents use are kind of reasonable. They don’t have that good of an economic condition right now so they say she might feel kind of left behind from all the cool stuff everyone else is having. But the cool stuff aren’t necessary for life (even my computer isn’t), like the kindle she was cradling yesterday. Having an iPad and a kindle isn’t exactly “left behind.” On another note, I’ve seen her snatch the iPad from her grandmother when I was getting a haircut at their house. Her grandmother kind of let her do it, so I suspect it might be more of a discipline thing. After all, her parents don’t really tell her to study and let her go around doing her own thing. Since when did parents become friends with their children?
A series of bridges and stairs enable the smooth flow of guest traffic to the ballroom, dining room, business centre and spa. Most dramatic is the asymmetrical cantilevered spiral stair on which guests promenade in droves to the ballroom at weddings and events.
6. Exercise at least 3 times per week.
Walker is also the birthplace of Eric Burdon lead singer of The Animals & later War. The Animals recorded a song called "Gonna Send You Back To Walker"
I cooled it buy filling a pan with cold water and pouring the sugar into it so it cooled instantaneously when it touched the water. The problem is, the sugar warmed the water and everything started to melt after a while. Although fun, I don't think I'd do it again cause I ended up with less toffee than I was supposed to.
A 2011 film, The Flowers of War is a Chinese historical drama starring Christian Bale who plays John Miller, an American mortician who arrives in Nanjing during the Japanese invasion in 1937. Miller is reluctant to help the refugees trapped in the church, but poses as the resident priest in order for them to help evade Japanese forces. It’s a Chinese-produced film directed by Zhang Yimou, filmed in Mandarin, English and Japanese. Most of the cast is Asian, but the film heavily promotes Bale in the trailer and the posters.
Don't lump me in with any of them because no one speaks for me. And I don't trust others of any group to which I may belong to voice anything agreeable to me. However, I guess I am somewhat of a Southerner. But only in the very best and finest aspects of that culture.
1/2 tsp baking soda
Caleb, who is 8, had this to say while in the car a few weeks ago. “Mom, did you know that if you took one hundred random people from around the world, only two of them would have red hair? I read that somewhere.” He is a wealth of interesting facts.
Dr. Le Kang, Institute of Zoology, Chinese Academy of Sciences, China.
“COPE aims to define best practice in the ethics of scholarly publishing and to assist editors, editorial board members, owners of journals and publishers to achieve this.”
is the beginning the beginning.
the flowers. I cut them out with my 2 split tool.
No – I have no regrets – I warmly welcome “Palace Exchange” and it’s many visitors.
Sunday was prepping the place for the onslaught of a dozen four and five year olds for the party before heading out to Olympic Park to see the Storm outplayed by the New Zealand Warriors. Standing out on the ground to hoist the players’ run-through banner, I had the feeling that this wasn’t going to be our day. The beers I had pre-game were like summer and winter – opposites, not one hot and one cold – one was ‘ice cream’ and the other ‘tide out’. And this despite the fact that it took THREE servers to get it wrong! Sanjeet, Ardip and Sharmi managed to take the order, the money and the pour and because I didn’t speak Urdhu we didn’t chat much. And, to top it off, the Kiwi’s got their national anthem in but then the sound system packed it in before the Aussie shiela could warble ours and the good natured crowd sang it instead – a Capella and out of tune. Badly. Should have seen the omen then.
I know for a fact that many of my readers and many bloggers out there love photos of Flora. Some of them are even borderline obsessed with it. So, if you’re one of those who are obsessed, borderline obsessed or just enjoy photos of plants & flowers. Consider this your lucky day!
Now, on to the actual drinking!
Anyway. Let’s end this post on a cheerier note. Here’s Dick Dale’s turbocharged surf guitar version of “Riders in the Sky”. Please excuse the cheesy visuals from the Ghost Rider movie.
at the computerized payment receiver, receiving the portion of the payment forwarded by the computerized merchant processor and applying that portion to the outstanding obligation made by the merchant to reduce such obligation.
The continental shelf issue has in the past led to tensions between Turkey and Greece. Greek Foreign Ministry spokesman Grigoris Delavekouras said that the determination of Turkey to move ahead with this venture – and license petroleum activities in areas south of Rhodes and Kastelorizo – was contrary to the rules regarding international waters. He underlined that Ankara cannot “undermine sovereign rights and powers of Greece, based on international law”, and promptly summoned the Norwegian Ambassador for a serious dressing down.
Distress Ink - Ranger - Scattered Straw
The cupcakes were stamped on Sugar cardstock with Memento Tuxedo Black ink - then colored and trimmed. Same thing for the frosting pieces. I stamped the cherry - then masked it off to stamp the frosting. All the pieces are adhered to the card base flat. Some Diamond Glitter accents add just the right "yumminess" to it!
Living here was such a sweet time for Chris and I. We were stretched, challenged, encouraged, affirmed, strengthened and loved.
I had a massage when I was pregnant with Forest and worried about how to mother this passel of kids I seem to have acquired. The massage therapist told me, "Remember that you are magical... that's what they need from you." I spent some time wrestling with that in my head--the practical mid-westerner in me (oh yeah, it's still in there somewhere) said, "Ha! Magical! Ha!" and then the free-spirited forest dweller said, "She's so right" Guess who won? Both. Neither. It's still a wrestling match. Some days I feel too wiped by the aforementioned mundane details to be very magical. The laundry piles up, no one likes what's for dinner, the baby pinches and bites and hits me, homeschooling is a fight and no one played their instruments. And then I remember that I am magical and powerful beyond my wildest dreams in their lives, simply because I am their mother. And, I can use my magic to sprinkle just a little more fairy dust into their lives before they slip out of Neverland forever (the baby teeth are nearly gone, and each one lost is rejoiced over!) Or, I can be the wicked queen who pushes my agenda on those in my realm. Gee--it's a tough choice. Actually, it is not always easy to choose to allow them to follow their dreams and feel their feelings fully---it makes for a lot of noise and mess, and sometimes I just want my fairy godmother to come in and offer me a spa trip and a massage--I'll be back by midnight, really, I will.
Antonio Marras
The math test was no joke. I thought I knew most of the answers, but a lot of the questions had me asking, how does this even pertain to printing? What does a can of soup for $0.09 or ounce-to-pound conversion have to do with printing? Regardless, I tried my best.
“That’s all they ever called me.”
In 2003, Noel Gallagher asked Rich to join Oasis. He declined, leading to The Sun headline: "He's not mad for it - he's just mad!" (Andy Bell eventually got the nod but it's a decision Rich doesn't regret). He played bass for Spiritualized for a while and also played guitar for Starsailor and Soulsavers, co-writing two songs on the latter's acclaimed 2009 album Broken. All extremely noteworthy achievements for any jobbing guitarist but a man of Rich's talents should be centre stage - the midfield playmaker, not in the holding role. Zidane, not Makelele. But unlike footballers, the careers of musicians don't necessarily fade with age so there's still hope that Rich's talent will be truly realised - and appreciated. In 2010, he's releasing an album under his own name for the first time - step forward mate, the spotlight awaits...
We had our annual after Christmas Christmas party last night. We went out to a place called Poor Boys and had a wonderful meal and great conversation. My husband told me that he was going to go hang out with his friend after dinner, my son stayed at his friends house and my daughter told me that she was going to stay at my cousin's house for the night. I thought...WOW...and night all to myself! I was actually quite excited about it until I had been home alone for about 10 minutes. I put in a chick flick and sat at the computer to just relax, but I just felt lonely. I wanted someone to talk to face to face.
2. Why should I hire you?
Article 146
There are 3 prizes! Doesn't that make you excited??
the nest-thieving doves’ mindless banditry:
Rob - Congratulations on winning the Sydney Taylor Book Award for Teen Readers. Thanks for taking the time to participate in the Sydney Taylor Book Award Blog Tour!
kisses it before taking to the pitch. It seems to work for him as he is now a favorite at Plainmoor having scored 12 goals in 35 games for the gulls he has proved he was given the number 9 shirt for a reason and has earned himself the nickname “Super Rene Howe” and long may it continue.
“Chicken,” CBF would taunt when I tried to beg off watching the latest flick to come on HBO. In the bright light of day, I’d deny everything. “I’m not a chicken! I can watch anything you can watch. I just thought making cookies would be fun.” It never worked. Watch the movie I would. Then night would come and no amount of daytime bravado would save me from the terror.
The resistance is now so great that it is only a matter of time. It will be the most significant and positive coup in recorded history.
But, it turns out that of all things, a traffic jam in the pickles, olives, salad dressings aisle ended up giving me a big smile that will probably carry me through the day. I am not officially public as a transwoman yet, so I was just out in a fleece jacket, T-shirt, jeans, and running shoes, my hair in its normal braid down the back. No makeup, no attempts to add a few hints of femininity.
He definitely brought the sultry and the sexy. It was very precise and very sharp. He certainly redeemed himself from last week.
But now I no longer wait, I am fully satisfied, I am glutted,
The Etzion Bloc includes the present-day towns of Efrat, Kfar Etzion, Migdal Oz and Ein Tzurim. These are internationally derided as “occupied territory”, “land theft” etc. The notes from this diary prove – as if further proof were necessary – that these towns were Israeli Jewish towns long before the Arabs appeared on the scene. The same story is repeated throughout Judea and Samaria (the West Bank).
AHA puts out guidelines regarding cholesterol profile recommendations. They are always revising their guidelines, but as of now they are as you see below.
Dear Me,
It has been a very nice day today.
I need YOU, those of you who kept reading even though tears are streaming down your face, to help me come up with an idea, give me a connection to make this Christmas one Coleman and Caden will never forget! THE BESTEST EV-A! Cause if TEAM LARSON has taught me ANYTHING it's to NE-VA DIV UP!
A little bit of drink, some well chosen foods, purposeful lighting, mellow incense, and some mood music and you’ve got all you need for a romantic evening with your beloved. Just find a baby sitter, put the dog out, and turn off the phone for an uninterrupted night of love. But in the case of a writer (or painter, or sculptor, or…you get the picture), these props can also be used to create an atmosphere for inspiration.
The winner of stamp set at FCCB "Save the Earth" Crawl.
Year round, Arlington continues to be the entertainment capital and home of Texas, where its visitors love it just as much as those who are proud to call it home.
He has read, and continues to read, a great deal more than I have and if I am honest, I stay away from certain topics. Not because they frighten me, but because I think I have enough, for the moment, to think about. The dots can and will be joined. Not by me, necessarily, but someone will (I think Alan Watt already has), but it remains....too big. Too orchestrated, too engineered. We refuse to believe it because our politicians simply aren't that smart. They are, in all probability, just marionettes. Empty-headed fools, arrogant enough to believe they are the elites within society, but do they know they are puppets? Do they? And if they do know, why do they continue to dance to the tune of madmen? And if they don't know, then that just confirms that they are as brainless as I have said.
The Thief Lord, Rated PG, ASIN: B000CNE07Y
plumeria blossom
The solution put forward by the Sierra Club is a move away from coal to ‘grasping the opportunity for expansion of renewable energy initiatives including solar and wind power’.
Is it necessary to wash your face in the morning? This will depend on your skin type. For dry skin. if you washed the night before, it is not necessary to wash your face in the morning again as it may be too dry for the skin.
26) Iggy’s (Singapore)
Clint Eastwood/John Malkovich (In the Line of Fire)
And......(drum roll please).... make your plans now to come to the annual SkallyWagz Halloween Extravaganza, Friday Night, October 31st, at Ricky Gene's on PCH in Lomita! See you then and "Happy Skalloween!"
1/3 cup Key lime juice
If you are beginning to clingy or demanding more time present with you or demanding you talk about this, it pushes them further away.
I sleep better at night
G)Goodness
Attempting to take a picture with the three boys. I went into it knowing that the boys wouldn't be clean or coordinated or well behaved. I leaned into the chaos in order to see the beauty in real life, right now.
Apparently it is worth something but not rebuild for the PC, because the elite premium service was canceled several months ago and the question of when the first map pack will be released for the PC, you still answer to the familiar – “soon”.
Next time (IF there's a next time!!) I will try to calm down and get MORE and better photos. Needless to say, being this was my first tornado, I was flitting about like a nervous bird!!! But I learned that a tornado goes by quickly, and you only have a few chances to get a good photo, so you better hurry up and focus and HOLD STILL.
“We have limited capability to sustain long-term operations in the Arctic due to inadequate icebreaking capability,” Berbrick said. “The Navy finds itself entering a new realm as it relates to having to rely on other nations.”
Remember this little favor,
My Blog needs more influences, I can’t live like this anymore.
50 states. 50 songs. 50 different artists (I think). I tried to vary the genres as much as possible, and, despite a little complaining, I actually liked the search. Also, I found some new stuff that I may listen to again. I hope you guys liked the list as much as I liked putting it together. If you want to catch up on the complete version, then check out parts – one, two, three and four.
sup with.
Thank you Nicole for sharing your creativity with us!!
The CAF distanced itself from Shaban’s statements but he refused to retract his remarks. Omar Shaban chose to resign from the CAF. He continues his vulgar racist and un-Canadian spewing on the campus of the University of British Columbia. When asked by a journalist why he remains here in Canada if he finds it so abhorrent he remarked that he was not finished his studies and likes school. Unfortunately for us but not so for Shaban he was born in Canada but raised in Lebanon.
Not sure if they’ve gotten the message - or not. But all of a sudden - I’ve found 2 eggs within a half-hour.
Model of patience
* homemade sour cream: to make 1 cup of sour cream, mix 1 cup (240ml) heavy cream with 2-3 teaspoons lemon juice in a bowl. Whisk until it starts to thicken. Cover with plastic wrap and leave at room temperature for 1 hour or until thicker (I usually leave mine on the counter overnight – except on very warm nights – and it turns out thick and silky in the following morning; refrigerate for a creamier texture)
Then there was the leaky air conditioner, the garage roof repair, the busted irrigation pipe, and a couple of late rent checks. Across four properties in three cities. And I'm working from a shotty new internet connection on a mattress on the floor.
(MUSIC)
However, mainly because of Chad, the class certainly had the potential to have gone off the tracks. He was a bad boy, not tough guy bad, but mischievously bad in quite a bold and audacious way. He'd do his best to get both me and the class going, but somehow, I would always manage to reign him in without too much fuss or muss. The class would laugh at or with him, but they would get back on task pretty easily.
I grew up in a home on a hill with a little house in the backyard. Many hours of play were spent in this little yellow house, which was once (long ago) a chicken coop- to our childish delight!
to cut across crumbling concrete
Thank you so much to Corine van den Wildenberg Head of School, Corinne Gerling, Milija Bozovic both teaching in Class 5 and all students involved for this creative and unifying piece which will represent Montenegro on the International Peace Quilt.
It's a family-run business with casual, if somewhat distracted service. Everyone on staff seems to be multi-tasking, but eventually you will be attended to, even if you have to hover near the kitchen to get their attention.
- Bon Lozaga - guitar & e-bow
Various references were made to young girls who appeared willing to accommodate a series of young men with mostly oral sex, almost as if they felt that was expected of them. In response to which we have to ask what sort of society we have created, and why it was created. Did young white girls think that way 50 years ago?
11/13 – The Living Room – Providence, RI
I came up behind her and wrapped my arms around her and gave her a hug. Just then she grabbed my forearms with both hands and told me I wasn't leaving. I kind of chuckled and told her I had to; she told me to call in sick. Her mother then laughed a bit and said, "Sweetheart she's already been to work, they'll know she isn't sick." I gave her one last quick hug and then walked out the door.
But next year I will be moving.
Amanda:"That's what I was fishing for."
They have been scrambling around the world trying to beg, borrow or steal any land where they could have sanctuary.
Only trouble is, I can't recall what I came outside for in the first place? :)
I know you guys are intelligent and you've all read and enjoyed Great Expectations and a lot of Dickens' other books, too. But a lot of people aren't that lucky. Some people might even think that this bilge is what Dickens really wrote.
”Happily, the legislature now supports two scorers, with greater differentiation using half-point differences. I think a cut score for the 2012 test at 3.5 is a fair reflection of our students’ abilities, and I’ll probably support the Commissioner’s recommendation.”
- Roy looks so much better without the Santa beard!
Enjoy! We'll see you back here in two weeks with our winners.
We left our back gate open, just incase she decided to wonder home.
“That is your reward and a gift from me. A reminder of this place and what it means. You must always wear it.”
The walls thence turned scarlet as they were bound to be, with the life and blood of the Lady who ruled them a moment before mercilessly
driver in line of sight of the weapon which killed them
Thus it was last Saturday. The sun was shining, the sky was blue, so I had a good excuse to go to South Park in The Hague (it’s really the name of the park). Once I was outside, I noticed that it was a bit chilly, but the thought of visiting the park with sunrays touching on my head, made me forget the breeze.
The entire piece is beautiful and inspiring, but the introduction spoke to me, making me realize how often a majority of my thoughts lend themselves to finding the improvements I need to make and the flaws that I have, losing sight of the magic of life around me.
While interrogating “Tommy Hansen,” he began to sing a song from Cabaret and then self-terminated.
Today's news is a bitter reminder that for the men and women on the ground in Afghanistan, the fighting and the dying are far from over, while British troops are injured in Helmand every week.
I have been hearing via email and on FB all the whining from a few fundamentalist Christians I know about this story, and how they believe that the minority should stop standing in the way of what the majority want to do:
Disc 5B (October 6th 1995) Yoyogi Olympic Pool, Tokyo, Japan
Remember how awesome it was to be a little kid? How you spent so much time in your own head, imagining that your backyard was a pirate ship, your bike was a horse and the woods were your make-believe home? My bestie and I would spend hours on her acre of wooded property, making forts and sneaking into the neighbor’s yard to feed apples to their horse.
Actor, Randy on Home Improvement
Okay, so this whole zombie obsession of the past few years has really started to drive me bonkers. It hit a head a week or so ago when my wife, Deirdre, came home from work at BU with a flyer that was being handed out regarding ‘what to do in case of zombie attack.’ Obviously farsical, the pamphlet nevertheless frustrated me beyond reason, and I need to vent. My blog strikes me as a pretty good place to do this, so here it goes. I should note that this rant is in no way personally targeted at anyone.
He takes me outside to relieve myself. We return, and a little while later, Mom arrives. They feed me.
You may remember the saga of Kemba Smith, the onetime Hampton University student who in 1995 was sentenced to 24 years in federal prison for her role in a crack cocaine ring led by her abusive drug-dealer boyfriend. He was later murdered; she gave birth to their son while in prison.
“All pain is either severe or slight, if slight, it is easily endured; if severe, it will without doubt be brief.” Cicero
Elks, and seals;
-text book to start, collar and elbow.
What DID get held onto after all those prolific things a barber did, was the credentialed aspect of it. The easiest part of being a barber is STILL being thrown into the arena of being so complex that one must be licensed to do it.
Here are three examples of charitable endeavors taking place during the 2011 holiday season.
Tomorrow place yourself in watchful expectation. Look for each sign of your approaching freedom. They may be small and hard to read at first. They will certainly be unmistakable very soon. And you will have discovered your true power. There will be those who still do not understand, some who scoff, who belittle. But having done this and watched its profound effect, you will never doubt again. It is the beginning in earnest of your discovery of who you are. You need not beg nor plead for things to change. You are the change-makers. You will have learned how to come together to create the world as you desire it to be.
That's all.
Here's another page I completed by layering paper scraps from the kit underneath my photo. Now I have officially used up every piece of patterned paper (except for the tiniest scraps) from the entire kit! Go me!
A few months ago a terrible thing happened. I had mistakenly assumed I had another jar of teabags stashed in the back of a cupboard but no! No tea to be found, and my mood darkened for it was a Monday morning at 8 a.m. when the only thing that saves me from a pit of gloom is a cup of tea with my tartine. I frantically called my mother, my PG Tips back-up supply, who by coincidence had also run out of teabags that weekend. Alarm and despondency on both ends of the telephone. Whatever shall we do? Carrefour had stopped stocking them…Stonemanor might have them but it’s out in the murky depths of Vlaams Brabant, or in the desperate ribbon development of Waterloo, and we have no means of transport! Could we face the trek? I’ve never been to Stonemanor. I expect it to be a place full of grim-faced British expats queuing in an orderly fashion for their fix of 8 euro jars of Branston pickle and cans of Strongbow while whingeing about the awful Belgian weather and absurd Belgian bureaucracy. Basically a shop full of people just like me. Nightmare.
More of Leona’s paintings and drawings, which are in many private and public collections, can be seen on leonafrank.com. And her blog about teaching art to children and adults is chalk-full of videos and detailed, illustrated instructions for intriguing art projects ranging from making monoprints to tissue-paper painting to drawing from observation.
31. The first American film to show a toilet flushing on screen was Psycho.
In addition to providing more light into our entryway, part of our motivation to add windows on the sides of the entrance (where the blue tape is boxed off) is to break up the massive white blob on the front of our house.
Why don't ad agencies/design agencies have staff photographers? What I mean here is that since editorial photography is dead and the age of copyright protection is over, I imagine you could find one or two great photographers that would be readily available for a staff position at a fraction of the price you'd have had to pay a few years ago for such a luxury. I mean wouldn't it be a treat to put an accomplished photographer on the payroll!
There is such a close relationship between the three of them and I love that they include me in their group. The favorite part of my day is when I go to collect them to lead them inside the barn. I tap the chain on the gate lightly and they canter to greet me. Pie always has to go in first because that is how the game is played. Pie used to assert himself to make sure everyone knew the rules, but now he is certain that we all know our parts and will play them correctly. Because of this confidence in his position, there is a comfortable "crowding" that occurs inside that gate without any posturing. I slip inside and often am putting a halter on Pie while being kissed and nuzzled by Foggy on Pie's near side. Sovey is an alligator and he has been known to bite humans. He knows this about himself and kindly keeps his body, tight against, but on the off side of Pie, so I feel safe. As I stand there with them I feel very blessed. Once I saw this (not so great but pretty) movie called Violets Are Blue. There was a scene with Sissy Spacek taking photos of horses on Assateague and she was hiding within the herd when the "bad guys" came. I remember seeing that movie and wishing that I was smooshed in with those horses. Now, I get to live it each day with my tiny "herd" of three!
The Body Finder by Kimberly Derting
I just worked my way through Deep Church by Jim Belcher (2009, IVP, Kindle Edition). In this book he investigates the debate between traditional and the emergent models of church. This is a raging debate in Christian leadership circles. If you aren't a leader, you might not think you care, but the truth is, the model of church will effect the way, the purpose and the form of your relationship with believers. Belcher talks briefly about the pragmatic movement of the church grow/seeker sensitive movement, but does not analyze it beyond deeming in dead. (Interesting that less than a dozen years ago, most of the students in my class were inline with this movement.)
First: punch border and cut slits ever so often. You have to play with the different designs to see where is the best place to cut them. I cut into every large loop.
I call them my "plans" for 2012.
The rating system for the two movies was problematic. The foul language of a grief-stricken child in Descendants was essential to characterization and garnered the movie an R. This means that the young viewers who could have really benefited from an art form that handled bereavement with such honesty will likely not see the movie, since parents are unlikely to allow children to see an R-rated movie even in the post-theater rental environment.
I know what choice I’d make. Thing is I’m not in it alone.
This past weekend I went to a concert that featured some amazing musicians. The bands My Epic and Ascend the Hill have a lot of talent and their songs have great lyrics. What’s even better about these groups is that their hearts are in the right place. After the concert, J.R. & I were talking to the drummer from My Epic and he made a comment about why he’s in the band. It was something to the affect of: ”I’m not in it for the fame, I’m in it to glorify God and spread His word….No matter what you’re doing, whether you’re a plumber or a drummer, do what you do for God. If it’s not for God it means nothing.” Needless to say, he was a cool dude.
So much for Oakland A's rookie outfielder Yoenis Cespedes starting the season off slowly. Depsite many predictions that the Cuban import would struggle against MLB pitching, he has already hit three home runs in four games this seasons. His stat line so far: .308/.400/1.077 with 3 home runs and 7 RBI. Yeah, yeah, we're only four games into the season, so who cares about stats. Well, they're still pretty impressive. If you want more proof that Cespedes should be given the keys to Bomb City, check out this absolute blast he hit on Friday night.
Still, a lot of agents will have pages on Publishers Marketplace or dedicated websites which will show covers of recent releases etc.
Finally - historical-crime author Michael Jecks wrote a very good swashbuckling blog post about Radio 4's 'story slashing'
Unusually for YA romance, Kiara Westford is a genuinely a bit of a dork. She's a departure from the brand of supposedly unpopular everygirl YA heroines who nonetheless find themselves attracting super hot boys in their droves. She dresses badly, she's introverted, and she's also a little bit of a prude. At the same time, she has guts and determination. She's recently overcome a stutter, she's athletic, and she loves a challenge. Carlos Fuentes, on the other hand, is sexist and obnoxious and knows exactly how good-looking he is. In other words, he's a walking ego. Not selling him to you? Well, he also has an endearing way of relating to Kiara's little brother, he's intent on protecting his family, and in Rules of Attraction he finds himself transformed by the real emotional connection he feels for a shy tomboy the old Carlos wouldn't have looked twice at. And FYI: watching his heart gradually melt is a beautiful thing.
I am proud to be prejudiced – I am prejudiced against muslim invaders who want to impose their customs, laws, food, religion and race upon ours.
1 measures
It’s a really good and informative read.
But today, I'll just post it here.
Title: Face to Face – Children of the Aids Crisis in Africa
Prince William switches off during interview whilst his wife to be talks of their engagement.
Right, calm is returning - this is what I wrote earlier anyhow:
Behind the façade of a dodgy-looking high-street dental surgery on Chatsworth Road – tacky bright yellow shop signs intact – the Alvarado Gallery is currently hosting its first pop-up exhibition.
Conley, a well-known and much-admired speaker, has written Emotional Equations so that it applies to both one’s business and one’s life. The equations appear, on the surface, to be easy, and that’s the point. No need to be intimidated here, folks. But there’s a great deal more to each equation, more ways to apply it to life, than perhaps it seems at first.
Massive PsyOp: WikiLeaks – Al Qaeda Terrorists Have Threatened To Unleash A “Nuclear Hellstorm” On The West If Osama Bin Laden Is Caught Or Assassinated ! Repost: Dead Osama Spotted Eating Hot Dog, Talking To Elvis, Threatens Most American With Severe Diarrhea and Declares War on Global Warming! Repost: Dead Osama Seen Eating Pizza, Talking To Michael Jackson And Threatens Most Americans With Erectile Dysfunction! CME Group Hikes Margin Requirements For Silver – AGAIN ! 3 Times In A Week ! Adrian Salbuchi: Obama Gets Osama?! The 9 Lives of Osama! Flashback 2008: Time Magazine – Is Osama Bin Laden Dying … Again? Gordon Duff: US Government Knew Osama Died In December 2001 ! Osama Bin Bogeyman? ‘CIA Getting Rid of Old Asset’! An Eye Witness Account of “Bin Laden’s Death”! US Announcement Not True, I Can’t Believe It! Alex Jones: ‘Bin Laden Dead’ Hoax Exposed ! Wayne Madsen: Bin Laden Death, Staged Terror to Escalate U.S. Into Nuclear War?! Ex-ISI Chief Hamid Gul: CIA “Choreographing” Osama Assassination Hoax! Paul Watson: Bin Laden’s Corpse Has Been On Ice For Nearly a Decade!
I hope this clears up some of the confusion on how to make these! If anyone ever has questions on how I make anything on this blog, you can always email me at livingcraftilyeverafter@yahoo.com!
Car Problems? Check.
Anyway, the building looks cool; that's about all I have to say. I will add, however, that I'm struck by how extraordinarily better the actual, constructed building is, compared to its rendering, seen below.
You might not notice it at first, even if you're sitting right there in a pew, but the worship room of First Baptist Church, Greenville, is designed to make us feel as if we're sitting under a huge tree together.
When he’s chosen for a once in a lifetime opportunity to hunt the last remaining humans, Gene’s carefully constructed life begins to crumble around him. He’s thrust into the path of a girl who makes him feel things he never thought possible—and into a ruthless pack of hunters whose suspicions about his true nature are growing. Now that Gene has finally found something worth fighting for, his need to survive is stronger than ever—but is it worth the cost of his humanity?
‘No, I made a new one!’ I told him about my new friend.
History is a fascinating treasure-trove. Dig in a ways and you’ll come out with an odd, collectible trinket like the fact that the Romans could hold hands with their neighbor as they were using the loo. History, for me, is also a form of escapism and seeing that our current reality is virtual (explore the world while sitting in your dirty underwear), I think I’ll do a little delving today.
After some time spent looking one of our eight tape measures (if I can't find the piece of technical equipment I need immediately, I go and buy another one, hence our home's collection of one thousand Phillips head screwdrivers, I might build an ossuary out of them one day, like that one in Greece, although I'm not sure how I'll fix them into the wall, think about it) I measure up the window. This time I am very careful to use centimetres.
